Super Hero Girls
    General 
Action Girl: Given the franchise, the girls can kick butt in their own, unique ways.
Age Lift: Much like in the original series, the major heroes are all teenagers in high school rather than young adults/adults like in other source material—though in Zatanna's case, this is Truer to the Text as pre-Batman: The Animated Series, she was indeed a teenager starting out when a lot of the JLA were adults years into their careers. This is also one of the older versions of Wonder Woman chronologically but in this show she Amazons develop slower than Greenland sharks so "Wonder Woman" still has a teenage body.
Blame Game: When Wonder Woman blames the team's first loss on Supergirl's failure to follow instructions, Supergirl retorts that Wonder Woman should be blaming Green Lantern for not putting up enough of a fight. Green Lantern in turn blames Zatanna for wasting time showboating and being reckless enough to hit both Wonder Woman and Supergirl with her spells. Zatanna blames Bumblebee for giving up and hiding.
Character Class:
Mostly by accident when Zee Zatara is kidnapped during #TheFreshPrincessOfRenFaire. Barbara Gordon, Jessica Cruz and Karen Beecher don't bother to change out of their Renaissance Fair costumes while Zee never gets the chance to. Supergirl didn't bother to dress up but ends up knocked into a suit of armor and decides to roll with it. Diana just showed up in fairly modest Hellenistic wear before changing into her champion(Wonder Woman) suit and then being given a suit of armor.
Barbara went as a bard, Jessica Cruz as an elven ranger, Karen Beecher goes as a fairy but is functionally The Engineer, Supergirl visually becomes a barbarian with her armor and mace, Zee is a Status buffing Witch Classic, Wonder Woman becomes a cavalier after jumping on a horse which is then enhanced by Zee, who also modifies Diana's weapon into a Jousting Lance and grants her a suit of plate mail.
Endearingly Dorky: Each one of them is this in their own way.
Diana is very prone to displaying this type of behavior, typically when she's discovering "World of Man" customs.
Babs fills this trope as a spunky, energetic fangirl of pretty much anything heroic with Batman being her main fixation.
Kara is tough as nails, but can't help but gush over cute animals. It's actually quite endearing.
Jess is normally this in other media due to being more introverted and insecure of herself. She's still this here thanks to her girl scout-like idealism and willingness to see the best in others.
Karen's a scientific genius who's rather low on confidence, making her cute as a button.
Zee isn't this so much in the present day, but as a child, she was such a cutie thanks to her love of her father, and trying to hide her insecurities.
Six Temperament ensemble:
Diana (Melancholic): the disciplined, but honorable leader.
Barbra (sanguine): the spunky Genki Girl.
Kara (Choleric): brash and hotheaded, but emotional.
Karen (Phlegmatic): shy but smart and reliable.
Jess/Zee (eclectic; Jess is either sanguine or phlegmatic due to her easygoing, yet stubborn attitude, but openness to new friends. As for Zee, she is either melancholic or choleric due to her flamboyant, egotistical, but loyal, and charismatic traits.
Lighter and Softer: Not that there isn't some comedy in the source material, but the comic books they originate from, Teen Titans for Bumblebee in particular, are often heavy handed when throwing the worst of life's problems at their protagonists and the characters tend to be grimmer in response to it. This also one of the softest takes on a Green Lantern Corps member despite featuring one noted for usually being put through the wringer. Even with Gotham being portrayed pretty much the same way it is in the comics this Batgirl is a lot less stern than you'd expect.
Nice, Mean, and In-Between:
Diana, Jess, and Karen are the Nice.
Kara is the Mean.
Barbara and Zee are the In-Between.
Refusal of the Call: Barbara Gordon gathers the group together as a Super Team except Kara Danvers rejects it because using powers only gets her in trouble(she's actually still trying to hide her Secret Identity in spite of the fact she already let having powers slip), Jessica Cruz is still actively refusing the call to be a Green Lantern so she of course refuses Barbara as well, Zee Zatara's an artiste not a police officer and Karen Beecher doesn't think she's good enough yet. Diana's Dare to Be Badass speech falls on deaf ears but they fall like dominoes once Barbara offers them the chance to give Diana a makeover if they at least try a team operation.
Secret Identity: Everyone has one, though Zee Zatara and Diana of Themyscira had to be convinced to take them up, Zee at first just electing to fight crime in her performance costume and Diana merely throwing on a hooded robe when she didn't want to attract attention. Zee jumping at the chance to play a part in crafting The Wonder Woman's secret identity is a major step in the team coming together.
The Team: Almost a straight example of the Five-Man Band: Wonder Woman is the disciplined and perfectionistic leader, Batgirl is her unorthodox and energetic lancer, Supergirl is the aggressive muscle, Bumblebee the shy brains, and Green Lantern is the pacifistic heart. Zatanna is the odd girl out in this ensemble, but could also be deemed the Girly Girl due to being the most girly member of the team.
Theme Music Power-Up: Each individual member has their own tune that plays when their super heroics are in focus, unless the episode involves their transformation sequence, in which case it will play there instead.
Town Girls:
Zee (the stereotypical Lovable Alpha Bitch and fashionista) and Karen (a Shrinking Violet who has typically feminine interests like romcoms and Boy Bands) are the Femmes.
Diana (a literal Amazon Warrior Princess) and Kara (a classic Metalhead with a Hair-Trigger Temper) are the Butches.
Jess (a Granola Girl) and Babs (a Genki Girl with Nightmare Fetishist tendencies) are the Neither.
Tomboy and Girly Girl: Kara and Babs (tomboys), Diana, Jessica, Karen and Zee (girly girls). One example is the fact Kara and Babs wore pants (ripped jeans for Kara, shorts for Babs) in contrast to Diana, Jessica, Karen and Zee's preference for skirts.
True Companions: At the end of the day, no matter how many quarrels or separations that they faced, the girls will always have each other's backs.
Transformation Sequence: "#Frenemies" reveals that they each have a unique transformation sequence for switching from their civilian forms to their superhero forms (though Karen's had already been shown in previous episodes).
You Are Better Than You Think You Are: Wonder Woman has harsh criticism for Batgirl and the team Batgirl assembled. She saves her harshest critiques for Supergirl. Wonder Woman does this out of love however, always adding that they all have the tools to achieve greatness and singling out Supergirl for having the potential to be the greatest hero the world of man has ever known. The team throw this back in Wonder Woman's face when trying to motivate her to stand up to Queen Hippolyta.

    Wonder Woman (Diana Prince)
Princess of the Amazons, Wonder Woman arrived in the World of Man to spread peace and prosperity by fighting evil while also being shown by her friends how to fit in as Diana Prince, foreign exchange student from Greece.

Abandoned Catchphrase: Wonder Woman's image has been merchandised, which she doesn't mind. She doesn't approve of the phrase "Great Hera" being attached to products bearing her image, however, and wants it to stop.
Absurd Phobia: A nightmare reveals she's terrified of technicolor teddy bears asking for hugs. Her reasoning being that people put stuffed versions of mankind's deadliest creatures in the beds of children. However, it’s later averted during “Enter Night Sting” where she was sitting next to a bee-themed teddy bear, seemingly getting over her fear.
Academic Athlete: Diana excels at volleyball, fencing, boxing, gymnastics, mathematics, chemistry and history.
The Ace:
Diana's just as skillful as a leader and combatant as her previous counterparts, still being more competent than adult amazons along with being incredibly smart in AP Calculus by scoring a 102% on a test.
Subverted in that her singing voice is absolutely terrible. Finding this out really throws her for a loop.
Achilles' Heel:
The girl's a genius, but try to get her to act like a teen or show her a text message full of emojis and she's clueless.
Put a bowl of ice cream in front of her, or really any dessert, and she loses all of her manners and just digs in.
Put Steve Trevor in the same vicinity as her and she's pretty much hypnotized and unable to do anything.
Adaptation Relationship Overhaul: The Post-Crisis Wonder Woman comic had Diana become a Cool Big Sis towards Julia Kapatelis's daughter Vanessa. While Diana eventually lives with Julia near the end of the first season, Vanessa in this continuity is already away at college and therefore never even gets to interact with Diana.
Adaptational Context Change
In most cases Diana enters a contest for the right to venture out into the world of man against her mother's wishes, and the circumstances she finds extend her stay into a mission to improve things, to her mother's annoyance. In this case Hippolyta declared the result of the contest invalid due to Diana entering without her approval, Diana left anyway, and decided what her mission was going to be all on her own.
Diana becoming a Homeless Hero was a plot point in DC Comics Bombshells. It was a consequence of her losing most of her memories during a traumatic near death experience and was supposed to be a Bitter Sweet Ending. Here it's a conseuqence of not being shown any hospitality when she arrived in a foreign land and Diana is perfectly functional in and happy with her situation until she realizes her friends think it beneath her.
Adaptational Dumbass: Wonder Woman is one of the wiser and more mature characters in this show but she has a much harder time adapting to the patriarch's world than most versions of the character. This is justified however, as this Wonder Woman is still developing cognitively and the Amazons tried to hinder her mission instead of helping her prepare for it as they had in the comic books.
Adaptational Modesty: Diana's back to wearing her classic design, though the bottom is a Greco-Roman skirt like the DCEU version rather than the usual Leotard of Power. Unique here, though, are double shoulder-straps and spaulders (shoulder armor).
Adaptational Personality Change: Diana is almost universally portrayed as being thrilled to hunt, but most versions of Wonder Woman stop short of actually killing anything they catch, being vegetarians with a strong preference towards fruit, nuts, dairy and unfertilized eggs. This Diana remains a carnivore through and through even after developing an exaggerated version of her trademark Sweet Tooth. Mostly for the sake of making Jessica Cruz even more uncomfortable.
Adaptational Wimp:
She doesn't have as many powers as any of her "main" comic books counterparts, nor does she display the ones she does have to same degree. However, this version of Diana became Wonder Woman earlier into her physical development than usual, and even in the comics it usually takes a little while into Diana's adult Wonder Woman career to gain or fully develop all of her gifts. Reasonable explanation for it or not though she still lacks the usual Wonder Woman ability to adapt to or fight off toxins, and she's one of the rare cases where Wonder Woman loses to Giganta in their first fight.
The lasso of truth is still an unbreakable variable length lariat that prevents the ensnared from lying while compelling those it binds to speak the truth. It does not have the defensive properties from the comic books like protecting the possessor from illusions, negating Mind Manipulation and purging harmful impurities from the body, however.
Age Lift: In most media featuring her, she is an adult woman (and depending on the world in question, has been an adult since at least one of the World Wars). While she is still a teenager like in the rest of the main characters of this franchise, she is not a literal teenager, being one of the older versions of Wonder Woman. She is the Amazonian equivalent of a teenager in this setting, rather than the Earth equivalent.
Always Someone Better: She unintentionally upstages Barbi Minerva in "Meet the Cheetah", from becoming captain of the gymnastics team to getting the highest score on an AP Calculus test.
Amazonian Beauty: Her people are basically the Trope Namer. While it's counterbalanced with the occasional Gross-Up Close-Up to show she hasn’t caught onto certain customs, Diana is just as muscular as her other incarnations and seen as just as attractive. Zee even calls her gorgeous when seeing her for the first time.
Ambiguously Bi: It's obvious that she has a huge crush on Steve Trevor, yet she also has quite a bit of chemistry with Tatsu Yamashiro.
AM/FM Characterization: In "#TheSlowAndTheFurious" and "#CrashCourse", she is shown to have a preference for classical music and Mediterranean folk-music respectively, befitting both her intellectual nature and her heritage.
Animal Lover: Not as much as usual, since this is one of the few cases where Diana Prince is a meat eater, but when an egg that was to be her breakfast hatches she has no problem raising the cub/chick as a pet. Karen Beecher reveals to the team that Diana's been giving their dogs care they'd otherwise be denied under cover of darkness(after which Barbara Gordon catches Diana giving Ace The Bat Hound a bath).
Appropriated Appelation: In this incarnation, the "Wonder Woman" name was first used by the news media.
Awesome by Analysis: Diana seems to be very good at analyzing; Kara initially refuses to show her her full range of abilities but she is able to pick up on her ability to fly in spite of Kara's attempts to hide it. Diana is instantly able to see through one of Zatanna's Doppelgänger Spin spells as well, something Lex Luthor's targeting systems cannot do. She even conceals her movements with the smoke from Ember's attacks better than Ember herself.
Beauty Equals Goodness: A majestic Amazonian Beauty who happens to be a passionate, kind-hearted hero, and is also arguably the nicest of her friends.
The B Grade: "#TheMinus" starts with her being upset that she has an A- on her report card.
Big Eater:
After having her first taste of sweets, she scarfs down not only her dessert (a huge bowl of ice cream) but also those of the other five girls.
"#LetThemEatPie" also has her in a pumpkin pie-eating contest against Doris Zeul and Barry Allen. As soon as Diana Prince tastes the pie and discovers she likes it, she starts chomping down every last bit she can grab.
Big Ol' Eyebrows: Hers are considerably thicker than those of the other girls.
Black Cloak: Initially wore this to hide her identity. During the makeover Karen Beecher explains that Princess Diana's folly was trying too hard to avoid drawing attention to herself, which tends to do the exact opposite.
Blunt Metaphors Trauma: She briefly thinks that the girls are being literal when Barbara says she would kill for a Batman poster in "#SweetJustice". When they explain the concept to her, it doesn't go well, with Diana going up to a burrito vendor and scaring him because she says she'll kill him (and doesn't help by chasing him screaming "Accept my payment or die!"). Zee later has to quickly points out that "death by chocolate" is another figure of speech.
Broken Ace: Diana excels at almost everything she does with much enthusiasm, but underneath that is an obsessive perfectionist streak driven by a strict upbringing as royalty with a mother that wouldn't accept anything less than perfection. She gets really twisted up in knots whenever she discovers any personal shortcomings, and will go to extreme lengths to make up for them.
Brutal Honesty: She is perfectly willing to acknowledge her nears, equals and betters, and equally willing to correct those who have no right claiming to be. She just takes it when Catwoman runs her down for being a terrible thief but has trouble suppressing a laugh when Catwoman claims to be her equal in combat. She also unintentionally insults Zee during #TheFreshPrincessOfRenFaire while trying to ease the tension that's been building between the two all day with a compliment. It has been conditioned by her mother.
Character Exaggeration: This Diana's personal interactions come from taking Diana's most awkward moments in Post Crisis and New 52 comic books to their logical extremes. Her love for ice cream is the most infamous example. When she first tried it out in the comics, she was rather cheerful to the point of being accidentally threatening (pointed a sword at the vendor while asking for ice cream and later thanking him), while here, she's crazy for it, taking her friends' ice cream after scarfing down hers, declaring it better than ambrosia in Elysium, and wanting to go to the ice cream parlor after every victory.
Class Princess: No pun intended. As seen in The Ace, Diana excels in all of her activities whilst being a Nice Girl.
Competition Freak: Takes this attitude toward a pie-eating contest in "#LetThemEatPie," even though she's completely unfamiliar with the rules. Once she tastes the pie (pumpkin) and finds out she likes it, she becomes even more determined to win, scarfing down every pie on the table and even tackling Lois Lane to get the one she's holding up.
Composite Character
Though she has Diana Prince's name and alter-ego, she has more in common with Donna Troy/Wonder Girl (her younger sister), specifically the version of Donna Troy from Super Best Friends Forever. They have the same role as the more serious Spock speaking leader of a goofy teenager team and Grey DeLisle even uses the same voice for both of the characters. Her Wonder Woman outfit is a more lightly armored version of Donna Troy's Wonder Woman outfit from volume 3, in Diana's colors instead of Donna's, with larger shoulder straps and spaulders.
Her powers are most similar to the teenage Diana of the Golden Age, while her appearance draws from the New 52 Comic Books and 2017 live action feature film. Her personality draws most heavily from reverted to teenager Post Crisis Diana, the New 52 Diana in general and the New 52 Donna Troy, who had her own awkward introduction to the world of man.
Her fighting style is definitely New 52 influenced, though she seems to have a nerfed version the Summon to Hand trick used by Artemis of Bana-Mighdall, who was nowhere to be seen in New 52.
Cool Big Sis: Plays this to the other girls, offering emotional and moral support. She's all too happy to help Karen Beecher with the "nerd things" Kara Danvers mocks her about, for one example.
Crush Blush: The olive skinned Diana blushes very heavily around Steve Trevor.
Cuteness Proximity: Experiences this upon finding a kangaroo plushie that looks just like a pet she had when she was 72 (a toddler by Amazon standards).
Deus Exit Machina: #TheBeeStandsAlone sees Diana Prince eliminated by technicality to ensure her team doesn't get an easy win at dodge ball.
Experienced Protagonist: Diana is already a seasoned superhero with hundreds of years worth of training and experience. Experience saving bystanders anyway. Interacting with bystanders is something she didn't get around to learning.
Extracurricular Enthusiast: Along with being captain of the gymnastics team and on the decorating committee, as of "#CrushingIt" Diana is also on the volleyball team, debate team, marching band, and drama club at school. Being The Ace, she does it all with relative ease.
Face Your Fears: As team leader, Diana had to take her own advice and overcome her fears as she urged them to do. And her fears were her mother, and escalators! More dire, Wonder Woman also stumbled into a second confrontation with Katana before her research into the foe that so easily bested the rest of her team and sent her into hiding was complete.
Famed in Story: Subverted: Wonder Woman, the star of a lucrative super hero brand, is famous in this world; Diana of Themyscria, The Wonder Woman actually defending the world, is not. "The Wonder Woman" isn't even a title she chose for herself. There are several pieces of Wonder Woman merchandise which aren't even consistent with each other in design and nothing looks quite like what she actually wears. In-Universe Adaptation Decay is so bad that even her personal friends ascribed catch phrases to her that Diana has never actually used and sometimes outright disapproves of.
Fighting Your Friend: Diana's fairly reluctant about going for lethal blows anyway, but is especially restrained when she learns Wonder Woman's hunter Katana is also Diana Prince's close friend Tatsu Yamashiro. Wonder Woman's focus on retrieving Katana's Soultaker over disabling Katana leads to Wonder Woman on her back embedded in the ground. Thankfully for Diana it cuts both ways, as Tatsu can no longer bring herself to finish off her friend either.
Fish Out of Water: She’s still a bit new to “the world of man” and needs the others to teach her how to fit in and pass as a normal person. That includes such challenging tasks as answering phones.
Foreign Exchange Student: The alibi that her team makes for her.
Friendly Rival: Diana Prince views Tatsu Yamashiro and Barbi Minerva not just as friends but as competitors. This confuses Tatsu, but she reciprocates. Barbi only pretends to reciprocate and hates Diana's guts.
From Hero to Mentor: She’s an accomplished superhero and teaches the others how to be heroes.
Gentle Giant: She's big and strong, but she's also incredibly sweet and friendly.
Girly Bruiser: After embracing into the world of men, Diana became one of the more feminine members of the team, but she's still a proud amazon who's capable of fighting off opponents with her signature sword and shield.
Girly Girl with a Tomboy Streak: As mentioned above, Diana is proven to be one of the more feminine members of the team after embracing onto the world of men, as she is a polite Class Princess whilst also having a strong passion for tradition. However, being an Amazon, she sports some traits that are quite masculine: she's a devoted warrior whose favorite activities are naturally fighting and training, and she also sport quite the Jabba Table Manners.
Good Cannot Comprehend Evil: Due to being Skilled, but Naive, Diana doesn't understand some villains are not simply misguided people, but enjoy doing bad things. Hence why she takes Leslie's blatantly fake apology at its word, and believes she got Barbi to let go of her hatred.
Gross-Up Close-Up: Sometimes the more athletic characters, Wonder Woman included, are drawn in greater than usual detail to highlight their physiques, but in Wonder Woman's case it is also done to highlight that she doesn't maintain her nails, shave her body hair or file down her calluses. Her face also becomes distended when flustered.
The Heart: Putting together the team was Barbara Gordon's idea but if Diana of Themyscira hadn't been dragged into their lives no one would have bought what Barbara was selling and the team disbands when Diana is dragged back out of their lives. Even when Barbara does convince them to come back together it's only for the sake of "saving" Diana. However, once the team truly is established, Jessica Cruz becomes The Heart, as while Diana still offers support where she can, Diana isn't suited for helping her friends through their day to day activities.
Hoist by Her Own Petard: A couple of episodes feature Wonder Woman being incapacitated by her own Lasso of Truth.
Wonder Woman: The Lasso compels me to tell the truth! ...This is humiliating.
Homeless Hero: Diana was initially living in a tree, as per Amazon tradition to live exactly where they find themselves after arriving in a new land. Her friends' attempts to change this does more harm than good, as they can't handle Diana's antics, and Diana's now embarrassed to go back to tree tops after having a taste of modern living quarters. As of #HousePest, she has all but been adopted by Julia Kapatelis, an archaeology professor studying Themyscira.
Hopeless with Tech: Diana Prince excels in mathematics and chemistry but has little idea how these subjects apply to the amenities of the modern world. As such she lets all the food in her first refrigerator go to waste, has no idea what to do when she dials the wrong number on her phone or accidentally puts it on speaker and finds autonomous machinery and remotely piloted drones unnerving.
Hot Blade: Parodied in #TheWarriorAndTheJester where stress over a ruined dessert causes Diana to sharpen her sword so aggressively it start to glow and proceeds to ruin two whetstones.
Huge Schoolgirl: She's one of the tallest females in Metropolis High, and one of the tallest versions of Wonder Woman, standing 6'2".
Humble Hero: Despite her incredible aptitude and prowess, she's incredibly modest.
Immortal Immaturity: Downplayed in that Wonder Woman is among the wisest and most mature characters on the show, and justified in that her body and mind are still developing. Still, she jumps to conclusions more quickly than is typical of Wonder Woman, has less impulse control concerning love of people and love of food, at one point even struggles to deal with her own envy. Wonder Woman had similar problems in the Post Crisis comic books when she had been forcibly reverted to a teenager.
Impossible Hourglass Figure: She's quite curvy and built, which might be because of her age.
Innocently Insensitive: Just like her DC Rebirth counterpart Diana is sometimes guilty of underestimating the gap between herself and everyone else. In #CrashCourse she fails to realize no amount of rigorous physical activity is going to make Karen Beecher as fast as a car, something the even faster and more mean spirited Kara Zor-El understands perfectly.
The Insomniac: #HousePest includes a low stakes parody of Diana's insomnia plot line from DC Rebirth, references her Instant Waking Skills from The Golden Age and gives her Wake Up Make Up too boot.
Jabba Table Manners: It seems Amazon society lacks any table manners. Diana gorges on handfuls of her food, sometimes planting her face into it if she really likes it.
Kneel Before Frodo: She mistook Jessica Cruz for modest royalty that she had just inadvertently challenged, and knelt down in front of Jessica in submissive forgiveness, much to Jessica's protestation.
Knows the Ropes: Diana possess a large arsenal of edged weaponry, but as the series progresses she uses less and less of it outside of training, mostly reaching for a rope when her hand and feet are not enough
Know When to Fold 'Em: After Katana cut down half of The Super Hero Girls, Wonder Woman commanded her remaining two teammates to flee with her, and as the other two proved too slow to escape, resigned herself to hiding from Katana until she could figure out her foe's abilities and limitations. Unfortunately for Wonder Woman, Katana vowed to hunt her down and Diana Prince's attempts to research her hunter lead to Diana calling her most trusted Japanese comrade Tatsu Yamashiro for help after Diana found herself stumped. Since calling Tatsu was the same thing as leading Katana right to her, "folding" was no longer an option.
Large Ham: She can enter this territory when it comes to her discovering "World of Man" activities, such as expressions and dodge ball.
Large Runt: Diana resents being called a girl, but biologically speaking she is. A girl already taller than most adult men but a girl from a place where the grown women stand above eight feet tall.
Leg Focus: Her tall build gives her some really slim, athletic legs.
The Leader: Batgirl puts the team together, but tasks Wonder Woman with whipping it into shape in exchange for the rest of them teaching Diana how to better fit in the patriarch's world. Wonder Woman often takes charge when she feels it necessary or just wants the first go at some novelty by citing "seniority".
Literal-Minded: Lesson number 5 in teaching Diana Prince how to blend into modern society are figures of speech, hyperbole and other non literal expressions.
Long Hair Is Feminine: She's one of the more feminine members, and Wonder Woman being Wonder Woman, her dark blue hair is exceptionally long.
Love at First Sight: Diana fell hopelessly in love with Steve Trevor, the first boy she ever met, when she first arrived in the World of Man...
Love Makes You Dumb: ...and whenever she sees Steve Trevor, she goes from a fierce, brave Amazon warrior to a blubbering, lovesick teen in an instant.
Mistaken Age: She ends up meeting the team because a truancy officer saw her walking around outside and assumed she was cutting class. Although she is equivalent to a teenager.
Morality Pet: Diana can be seen as this to Katana. Even when fighting her, she can't bear to severely hurt her due to how kind and caring she was towards her. Upon accidentally absorbing her soul into the Soultaker sword, she shows immense regret, and releases all the souls she captured.
Ms. Fanservice: Maybe not to the extent as most other depictions of Diana, but nevertheless, she's a beautiful amazon princess who has the most mature figure out of any female teen in the show, and her superhero outfit is the most revealing out of her entire team.
Mundane Object Amazement: Frequently, due to being out of touch with the World of Man. For instance, she mistakes a coin-operated fortune tellernote  for an oracle similar to the Oracle of Delphi and is immediately enraptured by it.
My God, What Have I Done?: Happens to Diana twice.
Combined with It's All My Fault the first time when "#KaraCare" starts with Kara suffering massive Kryptonite exposure from an explosion after facing Metallo (meaning his remains had Kryptonite), and it's implied Diana put Kara in that position. However, Diana tries to help Kara recover to make up for that.
"#SoulSisters Part 2" has Diana lead the gang to find the person stealing the souls of the villains of Metropolis, including the "Super Villain Girls" (which happened in Part 1). However, Katana finds them first, and Diana is the only member of the gang who survives Katana's Soultaker attacks (the souls of the others are sucked into Soultaker).
Nice Girl: Diana is one of the nicest members of the gang, even to someone like Barbi.
The Nose Knows: Subverted. The smell of pumpkin pie repulses Diana, but she's hooked on it after her first reluctant bite.
Not Even Bothering with the Accent: Averted. Almost every incarnation of Diana speaks with an American accent, but her accent in this series is meant to accentuate her heritage.
The Oath-Breaker: Diana tries to keep vows, but has stained her honor at least once for the sake of following her moral compass.
Oh, My Gods!: She frequently invokes the names of various Greek gods, leading her to say things like "By the white beard of Zeus!"
The Paragon: Diana was victorious in The Tournament of Aphrodite And Athena, and thus proved herself as the best representative of Amazon culture to the outside world. The Themyscira tribe holds her commands at equal value with their queen's. Even in high school she's described as strong, brave, disciplined, a star athlete ("Most Likely to Win an Olympic Medal," according to the school yearbook), and the perfect student.
Percussive Pick Pocket: A skill she learns from Catwoman and initially pulls off well enough. But the desired card isn't in the pocket she's told to pick and then Wonder Woman starts messing up as she's told to keep trying.
The Perfectionist: Queen Hippolyta taught her daughter to either perform flawlessly the first time, or train rigorously until she could. Now, Diana believes she's either perfect or a failure, no middle ground. Even something as minor as getting an A-minus instead of an A is enough to send her into a tailspin.
Plot Allergy: Diana is willing to take care of Dexter until she holds him, and it's revealed she's highly allergic to cats. This is averted in other episodes, with Diana holding cats without any trouble. Most obviously #AllAboutZee, which definitely takes place after #RageCat. It could possibly imply that she's allergic to specific cats.
Primary-Color Champion: Still wearing the good-old red, yellow, and blue.
Princess Protagonist: Is the Princess of the Amazons and one of the main characters.
Proportional Aging: 317 years old, but still considerably shorter than the adult Amazons, and would normally still be treated by them as an adolescent. She recalls having a pet kangaroo when she was 72. She went behind her mother's back to pass a difficult series of trials, which is why she still calls herself "Wonder Woman" and eventually gets them to recognize her as an adult.
Race Lift: She has olive-toned skin to accentuate her Greek inspiration.
Really 700 Years Old: She's 317 and is referred to as immortal.
Rebellious Princess: Just like the comic books, Diana can outdo the best of the adult Amazons while she herself is still developing. Unlike the comic books the queen doesn't allow her daughter to leave the island when she proves it by triumphing in a contest for the right and tracks Diana down when Diana decides to leave anyway. Downplayed in that while Diana is defying the wishes of her queen, Hippolyta is breaking her own law to protect her princess.
Religious Bruiser: She is reverent to Aphrodite, Zeus, Athena, Boreas, Panacea, Hestia and Hypnos, invoking them both when calm and under stress.
Right for the Wrong Reasons: Diana scoffs at a Global Positioning System program, insisting she can guide Jessica Cruz faster than such "unreliable" technology using a road atlas. She can, but Diana doesn't understand the rules of the road, the boundaries of the streets or that cars don't have minds of their own like horses, that all obstacles have to be avoided manually. Once Jessica informs her of the latter Diana does become complimentary of Jessica's skill as a driver, suggesting she would be even better with a chariot.
The Runaway: The vagrant kind. She initially tells the girls that she was sent by Themyscira to bring peace to the world, but then her mother shows up to bring her home and reveals that she ran off.
Secret-Keeper: Becomes an unwilling one at the end of #TheWarriorandtheJester when Harleen forces her to keep quiet about her secret identity by calling on the "favor" from earlier in the episode.
Shout-Out: In "#SoulSisters", she says the line, "I...am not left handed!"
Shrouded in Myth: Diana is oblivious to her own fame on two levels, but Lyssa, Superman and Batman quickly connect this "new" Wonder Woman to the legendary Princess Diana.
Sleepwalking: She sometimes fights in her sleep.
Smart People Play Chess: Diana uses chess as a metaphorical means of educating her peers in the world of man.
Smart People Wear Glasses: In her civilian persona, she sometimes uses glasses to help disguise herself, and she's a straight A student who is a competent leader and tactician.
Smitten Teenage Girl: Only around Steve Trevor. Get her in front of him and the Amazon princess dissolves into a blushing, babbling mess.
Spirited Competitor: Diana's relieved to have lost at fencing to Tatsu, as it means she now has a competitor worth defeating.
Spock Speak: The show really runs with the on and off "short on contractions" trend that started in the Post Crisis comic books by having her launch into regularly interrupted character filibusters. In this case it is used to demonstrate her awkwardness as much as it does her royal upbringing. Diana's even more awkward though when she tries to drop it while talking to Steve Trevor.
Statuesque Stunner: 6'2" and still growing, if the adult Amazons are anything to go by, and as a couple of characters in-universe can attest to, just as attractive as her other incarnations.
Strong as They Need to Be: The first time Diana of Themyscira fights Kara Danvers, Diana can only slightly budge Kara backwards from a standing position. Wonder Woman is later able to kick a charging Supergirl hopped up on red kryptonite skyward, however. Ironically Wonder Woman does worse in the fight where her strikes are more effective since Wonder Woman's attempt to follow up with a Meteor Move is denied by the flight capable Supergirl and Wonder Woman finds herself at a massive disadvantage off of the ground.
Super-Reflexes: Wonder Woman can't keep pace with the hit and run tactics of Supergirl or Cheetah, but can easily dodge their blows and consistently counter strike when they come within her wingspan. Her reflexes proved to be insufficient against General Zod, however.
Super-Speed: She's fast enough to catch motor vehicles and block bullets, but can just barely defend herself from The Flash and can't catch up to him if he wants to keep distance between them.
Super-Strength: Parodied in #TheMinus, where Diana hits a wall hard enough with a wooden broom to make the entire school lurch in that direction.
Sweet Tooth: She seems to really enjoy desserts. She scarfs down ice cream after tasting it for the first time, and in "#LetThemEatPie", we see pumpkin pie is another dessert she learns to love a lot.
Taking the Bullet: She takes a hit from one of Katana's soul-sucking blasts to save an innocent man's life.
The Strategist: Wonder Woman has the highest track record when it comes to formulating winning strategies on the show. She does consult Bumblebee for insight into technological foes, Zatana when suspecting her understanding of enemy magic is lacking and Batgirl on espionage but still is usually the one who decides on the course of action.
Tomboy Princess: She's girlier than Kara, anyway, but she is an Amazonian, after all. Overlaps with Rebellious Princess.
Totally Radical: Her attempts to use normal teen slang often result in this: "I possess dance moves which are rich in fleek!"
Trademark Favorite Food: Ice cream.
Transformation Sequence: She has two. One is the spin from the 1970s Live Action series and there's a new one usually done in sequence with someone else's made for this show. Wonder Woman even uses one in reverse to revert back to Diana Prince!
Turning Into Your Parent: While comic book Diana is all too aware of this possibility, and avoids it to a fault, here Diana lacks the self awareness until Aunt Antiope calls her out on it.
Unusual Pets for Unusual People: In grand tradition, Diana has an atypical pet. This time it is a griffin that was supposed to be her breakfast.
Walking Tech Bane: In the earliest episodes she still does not have a hang on modern technology. And by that we mean modern plumbing, nearly destroying Green Lantern's house with her misuse of it alone and thinking she was being helpful to Jessica in the process. When taking a driving class Diana manages to stall a car without even leaving the parking lot.
Warrior Princess: An Amazonian Princess, this is to be expected.
"Well Done, Daughter!" Girl: She spends most of "#MotherKnowsBest" trying to win Queen Hippolyta's approval of her chosen lifestyle during the latter's visit to Metropolis, but instead becomes increasingly jealous of how well Hippolyta and Kara are getting along. Hippolyta eventually admits that she is proud of Diana and always has been, even if she doesn't say it aloud.
What Does She See in Him?: None of the other girls can figure out why she's so infatuated with Steve Trevor, who's a Ridiculously Average Guy.
What the Hell Is That Accent?: Diana's accent confuses many viewers. Fans have wondered whether it's Italian, Spanish, Mexican, or what? There seems to be some Mediterranean influence but a hint of Latin American slightly similar to Jessica Cruz(Who seems to be Mexican). It's likely supposed to be Greek, to go with Themyscira's Greek inspiration with a touch of "Latin" for "Rome".
Willfully Weak: #TheMinus reveals Amazons eat a special fruit before battle to boost their energy levels, but Diana had never felt the need to eat one until the events of the episode. Kara Danvers is convinced the things aren't worth it and need to be tossed for Diana's own good. Karen Beecher disagrees until she sees the effect a single bite has on Barbara Gordon.
The Worf Effect: Her prowess eventually earns the respect of her entire team, and she's often the last one standing when they run into trouble. When Wonder Woman is taken down early it tends to give everyone but Supergirl pause.
Your Costume Needs Work: Wonder Woman is already a famous superhero with a media franchise by the time of the first episode, or rather Wonder Woman is a famous franchise based off of a mysterious figure Shrouded in Myth. Diana herself isn't recognized, being accosted by a truancy officer and even called a cheap cosplayer by Kara Danvers. We later see at least three other people dressing up as Wonder Woman and all of their costumes are noticeably different from Diana's outfit, as well each other. Red and gold on top and blue bottoms with white stars being the only consistencies.

    Supergirl (Kara Danvers)
As the last daughter of Krypton, cousin to Superman, and adopted daughter of the Danvers couple, Kara has a bit of an anger problem thanks to Superman becoming her social superior and Kara being seen as a delinquent. She's still able to save the day as Supergirl.

Acquired Situational Narcissism: After donning the "Power Girl" identity and costume, she very quickly lets the fame go to her head, to the point of claiming she flies solo. It took her almost getting killed by Livewire again to snap out of it.
Adaptation Origin Connection: In this continuity, she inspires Ted Kord to become the Blue Beetle by saving his life.
Adaptation Personality Change: She's more rebellious and hot-tempered than most Karas, especially the original DCSHG Supergirl. Though Kara sometimes has anger issues even in the comics (to the point where she was once a Red Lantern).
Adaptational Context Change: Adventure Comics #397 started a trend of Supergirl going through different outfits based on fan submitted sketches, with the villain Zond shredding her original look as the justification, and her first new suit being made by Diana Prince, who was running a boutique. Here Supergirl's clothing is intact, she's changing looks to fake her death and Zee Zatara is the one providing the new clothing, which rapidly changes due to Kara not liking what Zee comes up with.
Adaptational Jerkass: This show's Supergirl does draw pretty heavily from DC's Post Crisis comic books but she's got the worst of Post Crisis Supergirl and Post Crisis Power Girl's social traits, the destructive tendencies of New 52 Power Girl, and the bad public relations of New 52 Supergirl stuffed into one package and wrapped with Post Crisis Superboy's civilian clothing. The thing most original to this show is that she's also dumber than any "main" version of Kara from the comics while having the bulk of every Kara's negative traits. Also, she doesn't have the excuse of a chemical imbalance like Post Crisis Supergirl, which also means she can't be treated, nor does she have the existential crisis of Post Crisis Power Girl, it's everyone else who needs to know how awesome she is! While this Kara hasn't experienced as much trauma as they have, she still has enough to explain some of her behavior, however.
Adaptation Distillation: Power Girl was Supergirl first in the New 52 comic books as well, but this show leaves out the Earth Two universe and the existence of two Karas in favor of just have Supergirl temporarily change her identity.
Adaptational Dumbass: In the comics, Kara is a science genius even by Kryptonian standards, and Krypton is eons more scientifically advanced than Earth. Here, however, Kara is significantly less proficient at science. In "#SuperWho", she doesn't understand any of Karen's scientific speak, even though it is literally what they learned in chemistry class in her Earth high school that day.
Karen: Remember chemistry class? High temperatures can break chemicals down to their base elements!
(Kara stares at her and lifts her shoulders and hands up in an "I don't know" shrug)
Adaptational Modesty: After deciding to let the people think Supergirl died in the fight against Livewire, Kara takes on the new identity of Power Girl. However, the famous Cleavage Window on her outfit is noticeably a lot smaller than the original Power Girl's.
AM/FM Characterization: Kara listens to heavy metal and hard rock, which is perfectly in line with her rebellious personality.
Apologetic Attacker: She initially does this in her fight with Diana, as she thinks that she just punched a normal girl through the wall.
Arbitrary Skepticism: In #SchoolGhoul, she says she doesn't believe in ghosts despite previously having her very own soul taken by Katana, who lampshades it. Kara handwaves it as being no proof.
Asleep in Class: Just to emphasize that she cares the least about her studies.
Balloon Belly: As a result of her Big Eater tendencies, she's seen sporting a fat-looking gut after eating a bunch of turkey legs at a Renaissance Fair.
Berserk Button: Being compared to Superman or mistaken as his sister. She's trying hard to be a superhero in her own right but feels overshadowed by her more popular cousin to the point one can see some shades of resentment. She nearly yelled at a kid at one point when they thought of her as a Distaff Counterpart.
Big Eater: While not shown often, on occasion it's shown that she will really indulge in ice cream or comfort food when she can.
The Big Girl: She’s hot-tempered and aggressive, and as a Kryptonian, is by far the physically strongest person on the team.
Blessed with Suck
She bemoans the fact that she can’t get tattoos or piercings or dye her hair because she’s invulnerable.
Her super hearing can pick out all vibrations around her, but she has trouble shutting if off and just focusing on one thing. Still has a better attention span than Barbara Gordon though.
Blood Knight:
Before warming up to Jessica, Kara Danvers tries to assault her for attempting to break up Kara's fight with Princess Diana.
"#KaraCare" shows that, unlike every other iteration of the House of El's surviving members, she actually wants to fight Doomsday!
Boisterous Bruiser: As the muscle of the team, she tends to be brash, but outgoing.
Boyish Short Hair: She wears an uneven bob and has a rebellious attitude.
Bratty Food Demand: Kara insists on calling Ember "Amber" and mocking her for being a nerd while frequently returning to Ember's food booth for more helpings, at one point demanding that Ember put a turkey leg directly in Kara's mouth.
Breath Weapon: She has two, but rarely uses them, as that would require more thought than blasting problems she can see with her eyes or hitting them with her hands.
Brought Down to Badass: Subverted: In #AllAboutZee Kara loses most of her power but retains a great vertical leap and degree of toughness. Diana thinks that will be enough, but it isn't. Even when Kara loses all of her power completely she's still a tall and very muscular teen...with no cardio vascular endurance, no pain tolerance, no confidence, a severe lack of good sense and little experience with common tools like bicycles. A sharp departure from how The House Of El are usually portrayed when weakened or depowered.
Brutal Honesty: When it becomes clear Diana cannot sing, it falls on Kara to tell her. While the others are upset at her bluntness, Jess quietly thanks her as well.
Calling Parents by Their Name: She insistently refers to her foster father Jeremiah Danvers by his given name.
Callousness Towards Emergency: While The Super Hero Girls are sharing a bowl of ice cream, passing it around in turn while each gives an opinion on owning vehicles, Kara gets angry and bends the spoon they're using so Karen can't scoop any while ranting about having to give way to ambulance drivers. Barbara then gives everyone their own utensil.
Character Tics: Kara tends to dig for earwax when she's at a loss for things to do.
Composite Character: Mixes Supergirl's outfit and adopted last name with Power Girl's hair, physique, and personality (and "#PowerSurge" even sees her don the Power Girl costume and identity). Likewise, her civilian clothes strongly resemble Conner Kent's 90's outfit.
Create Your Own Villain: She accidentally creates the final threat of #Superwho and is then dejected over not getting credit for stopping it, even though she wouldn't have been able to do that much without Karen Beecher.
Cuteness Proximity: Suffers from this in "#AdventuresInBunnySitting", gushing over the pair of white rabbits Zatanna leaves in her care and even giving them nicknames.
Dark and Troubled Past: She was old enough to remember when Krypton was destroyed and was frozen in space for years before being found. Then, she was expelled from Smallville High School for destroying the gym, even though she insisted she'd been framed for it. In "#TheGoodTheBadAndTheBizarre," the principal of Metropolis High uses this as grounds to accuse her of a rash of vandalism and suspend her. She turns out to be innocent; a Bizarro counterpart of her was responsible for both incidents.
Deadpan Snarker: Along with her Brutal Honesty, she's got a lot of snark in her.
Defacement Insult: Supergirl makes a genuine effort to stop Bizarro Supergirl from causing destruction, until it comes to a Superman statue. Supergirl blasts its head herself.
Desk Sweep of Rage: Kara's response to Diana trying to teach her the value of strategy through chess is to knock the board off the table and nearly into Barbara after being put in check.
Destructive Savior: Brash and abrasive attitude + Kryptonian powers = things getting wrecked. This is the first flaw in Kara that Diana seeks to improve...but progress is slow. Deconstructed in #PowerSurge, as her destructive way of fighting causes most to not actually like her despite the good she does.
Disproportionate Retribution: Played for Laughs, and probably unintentional. Kara arranges the breakup of a happy couple during #SilverScream just because they are making too much noise during Summer of Danger V.
Does Not Know Her Own Strength: Her attitude will easily get the better of her, leading her to wreck and damage things in the process without her realizing it. Alarm clocks, cars, lockers, her cell phone...
Dope Slap: Kara eventually punches Barbara in the arm for repeatedly making light of kryptonite's effects on her.
Dressed in Layers: Wears her costume under a jacket in the way that Kon-El did.
Dude, Where's My Respect?: Everything she does either gets compared to Superman, or he gets all the credit. This is especially galling because she's chronologically older than Superman (Clark arrived on Earth first while she was in suspended animation), and it's gotten to the point that nobody outside the team can get her code name right, with the public sometimes calling her Supermangirl or Mrs. Superman.
Dumb Muscle: She is the team member least likely to use her intelligence to solve problems, and is also the strongest.
Embarrassing Nick Name: She's praised for saving Metropolis from Shaggy Man in #StrainedFighters...and then laughed at for how bad the makeshift costume she wore while doing it was, due to her Supergirl outfit being in the wash. She's makes front page news as "Hot Mess Girl" and is negatively contrasted to Superman.
Epic Fail: In "#AngerManagement", Mr. Chapin brings up that Kara is doing so poorly in school that she's somehow flunked homeroom.
Mr. Chapin: How do you manage to fail a block of time that doesn't even give grades?
Evil Costume Switch: While under Ra's Al Ghul's mind control, Supergirl's costume gains a sinister looking red and black color scheme. It changes back to normal once the spell over her is broken.
Fastball Special: Her part in defeating the kraken of #AwesomeAntiope is thowing Wonder Woman at it.
Fire-Forged Friends: Kara's the one most skeptical of Wonder Woman's identity and the slowest to warm up to her even after Wonder Woman proves who she really is. However, Supergirl doesn't just come to respect Wonder Woman for her capabilities, she doesn't just come to like Diana as a friend, but Kara becomes the one most concerned for Wonder Woman's well being. She's the first on the team to face her fear of Livewire when it becomes clear Wonder Woman's going to be fried and is determined to crush a monster she doesn't even know anything about yet for assaulting Diana in the locker room.
Flying Brick: She wouldn't be Supergirl if she wasn't one. Also with three forms of fire power.
Forgot About His Powers: When a bunch of people stand up in the theater during ''#SilverScream, blocking the view, Kara decides to clear the way by burning into the seating with her heat vision, instead of just looking straight through them with her EM spectrum vision.
Gale-Force Sound: Kara hooks her guitar up to enough amplifiers to blow Karen away from the sheer noisiness alone.
Gasshole: According to Zee, Kara likes to belch the alphabet.
Gift-Giving Gaffe: Kara gave Jessica Cruz an "I Owe You" for Jessica's birthday.
Glad I Thought of It: When Karen Beecher suggests Kara's new identity be called "Power Girl", Kara shoots it down as stupid and but then claims to have a "Eureka!" Moment...before publicly introducing herself as Power Girl. Granted, she probably wasn't paying attention to Karen, and neither of the girls seemed to notice it either.
Glowing Eyes of Doom: She has two ways of seeing in the dark. Tracking heat and projecting it..
Good Is Not Nice: She may not be the nicest member of the team and is the most destructive and callous, but she is still a genuine good person at heart.
Green-Eyed Monster: She's super envious and resentful of her cousin Superman. Considering she's really the older one (she babysat him on Krypton in fact), only less mature physically and experience-wise due to spending years drifting in space in hypersleep while Clark came to Earth first and thus didn't have that problem, she's got a pretty good reason, not to mention Clark doesn't do any favors by being patronizing towards her, and a bit of a showboat. She's also aware that Wonder Woman is more popular than her, but she initially doesn't know who this Wonder Woman actually is and later becomes her friend, so the resentment from that ends up directed at Superman too.
Hair-Trigger Temper: She's got a pretty nasty temper, so much in fact that it's a plot point during "Anger Management".
Happily Adopted: She may not always show it, but in a way, Kara is grateful for her foster parents.
Hartman Hips: Her round hips are essentially wider than her waistline, and she also has an extremely curvy rear-end.
Healing Factor: In the event something does manage to hurt Supergirl the damage will quickly be repaired. Exceptions are when she is hurt by kryptonite or magic.
Heavy Sleeper: Kara can sleep through almost anything; it's partially justified by her invulnerability, so she doesn't even feel a flamethrower or a dynamite explosion.
Hell-Bent for Leather: Her coolness is accentuated by her leather jacket.
Hidden Depths: Despite being something of a punk rocker ("Most Likely to Become a Rock Star," according to the yearbook), she has an incredible soft spot for cute things, as shown in "#AdventuresInBunnySitting".
Hippie Parents: If the dress they foisted on her for picture day is any indication, her foster parents/legal guardians, the Danvers, are these.
Implausible Deniability: She keeps trying to deny she has anything to do with super heroics after the other five Super Hero Girls come clean with each other and they all saw Kara's abilities at work. Once Diana shows them that Kara can fly Kara finally gives up.
Impossible Hourglass Figure: Her upper body, hips and legs are broad and muscular, with a waist only slightly wider than her neck.
Insistent Terminology: She insists that the only kryptonite is actual Kryptonite, getting annoyed when Babs compares Diana's lovesick reaction to Steve to it.
Jerkass Has a Point
In general, Kara is brash, destructive, insensitive and driven by jealousy, but she's not wrong about Clark's ego or the fact that she doesn't get her deserved respect from the public. She still averts disasters and stops menaces more destructive than herself.
During "Enter Night Sting", she made a completely valid point that she isn't the only one who borrows Karen's stuff without asking, which Karen actually agrees. Pretty soon, it cuts to a scene where the other girls are eating parts of her lunch bag she brought.
Jerk with a Heart of Gold: Again, she's brash and rebellious, but still good.
Barbara Gordon: She wants you to think she doesn't care, but really, she's just a big softie.
Emphasized in "#AccordingToGarth" where she develops a genuine friendship with Garth (Aqualad) and enjoys doing his robot-fight games.
Know When to Fold 'Em: When General Zod emerges from The Phantom Zone with Non and Ursa, Supergirl does kneel before him to protect the world. However, when Zod doesn't recognize Kara Zor-El and demands Kal show himself, Kara loses it and decides to fight Zod anyway.
Kryptonite Factor:
"#KaraCare" starts off with her suffering from this after facing Metallo. His "remains" have enough Kryptonite to severely weaken Kara to where Diana feels guilt about having Kara where it could have happened.
"#MeetTheCheetah" shows another weakness Kryptonians have: magic. When facing Cheetah, Supergirl accidentally gets zapped by Zatanna (who was aiming for the Cheetah herself, but the Cat Girl dodged the spell in time). Also, in "#SoulSisters", she's as vulnerable to Katana's sword attacks as anyone else.
Leeroy Jenkins: In "#FightAtTheMuseum#" she develops a habit of charging headfirst into battle without waiting for the rest of the girls. At one point this forces Green Lantern to take more violent than usual measures to save Supergirl from a mega microbe, this being when Supergirl has been hypnotized in an attempt to make her less aggressive. She even references the trope namer:
All right, time's up! Let's do this! SUPERGIIIIRLLL!!!
Leg Focus: She's muscular-legged, and her pants make up for it with her anatomy. Compared to the rest of her friends, including Diana who is the tallest in the group, Kara stands out.
Lethally Stupid: Karen attempts to help Kara in what is either a chemistry or physical science class but Kara fails to follow Karen's instructions and ends up causing an explosion.
Male Gaze: She has a big butt compared to her other friends. This usually isn't noticeable due to the show's focus on faces, usually only seen in milisceond glimpses while Kara is in her civilian identity, in profile or behind. But there is a little indulgence during her brief stint as "Power Girl"(the cape is lengthened in this outfit for the purpose making sure it is usually in the way)
Metalhead: Kara jams on her electric guitar and is a huge fan of heavy metal and hard rock. This results in her looking down on other genres of music, as shown in the short "#TheSlowAndTheFurious", where she got into an argument with Zee and Diana over what music station they should listen to, jazz, classical, or metal, and in "#LeagueOfShadows", where she scoffs at Karen's preference for the boy band Up Past 8 and drags her to a metal concert instead. She also, naturally, has the civilian outfit to match: leather jacket, ripped jeans, and dark red combat boots.
Ms. Fanservice: The curviest member of the cast, with her large breasts and wide hips giving her an Impossible Hourglass Figure. One episode even has her wear the Power Girl outfit, complete with its infamous Cleavage Window.
Never My Fault: It's a silly superstition to begin since it's completely Played for Laughs, with but Kara was the one who claimed nothing could stop Diana in #CrushingIt before Steve Trevor arrived and ruined her volleyball game. Yet Kara blamed Karen Beecher for "jinxing it". Supergirl also blames Bumblebee for Catwoman's betrayal of the team in #AllyCat, even though Supergirl's the one who suggested going to Catwoman for help. Kara even blames Jessica for not warning the team about how shrewd Lois Lane was even though Kara was the most dismissive of Jessica's warnings.
Not a Morning Person: Smashes her alarm clock while waking up. Fortunately, she has spares.
Not So Above It All: Kara Danvers claims to hate all things nerdy, and for the most part this proves true. She does become attached to a video game at the arcade, however, to the point of annoyance when Harleen Quinzel distracts Kara while playing it and then accuses Kara of not being any good at it. By #MotherKnowsBest Kara is a full on video game enthusiast.
Picky Eater: She refuses to even try sushi until it's cooked, which Kara ends up doing with her Eye Beams.
Playing Sick: The short "#KaraCare" has Kara pulling this stunt, getting Diana to care for her long after she recovered from Kryptonite Poisoning.
Popular Is Dumb: Kara's reasoning for seeing The League Of Shadows over Up Past 8 is that the latter group are too popular to be cool. Karen isn't sold but Kara has Super-Strength and everyone else present is too engrossed with a movie to care.
The Power of Rock: She uses a guitar like the one she has at home (which keeps blowing out the electrical wiring) to help save the day in "#SweetJustice".
Pretender Diss: When Karen Beecher and Barbara Gordon identify Diana of Themyscira as The Wonder Woman, Kara Danvers dismisses Diana as a cosplayer. When Barbara then admits that she is Batgirl she's also dismissed by Kara as one.
Pungeon Master: Likes to let loose as many puns as she can apply to the situation. Rarely do her teammates appreciate them.
Rooting for the Empire: In-Universe Kara's teammates, excepting Babara Gordon, find the Stop Sign Massacre series highly disturbing. Even Barbara winces at the fate of the murder victims, but Kara Danvers actively roots for the serial killers!
Sleepwalking: Supergirl is guilty of flying in her sleep. And being a Heavy Sleeper, waking her up is pretty much impossible, so the only option is to direct her back to the bedroom, which is almost as difficult.
Smug Super: While under the effects of Ra's Al Ghul's brainwashing Kara Danvers goes from merely insensitive, brash and temperamental to taking pleasure in the pain and inconvience she causes other people.
Street Smart: Supergirl is more of a "punch first, think later" kind of woman, but she has her moments. While the team's first victory comes from actually considering Wonder Woman's advice and Batgirl deciding the best way to go about it, Supergirl's experience in causing unnecessary destruction ends up proving just as valuable with a proper outlet for it. Hippolyta also finds Kara's tour of Metropolis funner than Diana's.
Stubborn Hair:
Her hair is impervious to any attempts to cut or style it, including power sanders, blowtorches, and even dynamite. It takes the combined might of nine adult Amazons just to move it out of place(or the kick of one Wonder Woman, but it quickly resettles from that).
Her hair is also the least effected by Livewire's shocks, especially when contrasted to Zatanna's. Although it turns out Zatanna's magic can change Supergirl's when she dons her "Power Girl" identity.
Super-Senses: Kara has infrared vision that allows her to find people in the dark and she can even see through walls if she wants to.
Super-Speed: This is used against her when she is accused of vandalizing the Great Wall Of China and damaging the Taj Mahal despite being in Metropolis, people thinking she's fast enough to pull it off despite Supergirl insisting she's being framed. It works in her favor while pummeling Giganta, however.
Super-Strength: Kara can lift cars and punch people to the horizon. With a little elevation from her flight she can even send objects into space.
Teeth-Clenched Teamwork: During "Scrambled Eggs" she resolves to do her best Egg Sitting with Harleen Quinzel in an effort to keep herself out of summer school.
Tomboy with a Girly Streak: Kara is a short-haired, leather jacket-wearing, Boisterous Bruiser with a nasty temper and is passionate in heavy metal and hard rock music, while also being absolutely enamored with cute animals and even wears a skirt as Supergirl with zero problems.
Troll: She often joins activities she otherwise has no interest in for the sole purpose of mocking the participants, even when said participants are her friends. This includes school dances, renaissance faires and trick or treating.
Truer to the Text: Her personality is closer to her current comic incarnation, an angry, angsty alien who doesn't even seem to like being Supergirl all that much, as opposed to her ditzy personality of the previous series.
Unreliable Narrator: DC FanDome Short #2: Liars has Jessica Cruz interviewing Kara Danvers for The Daily Planetoid. Whenever Kara says something that isn't true the screen cuts away to a scene to show exactly how she is lying.
Unskilled, but Strong
The pilot establishes that she Does Not Know Her Own Strength, and her attacks are telegraphed, as shown by Wonder Woman managing to avoid her punches rather easily early on in their fight. This comes back up in "#FightAtTheMuseum" where Diana points out that her Leeroy Jenkins attacks won't work all the time. She took this advice after being trolled by Catwoman.
Supergirl had never wielded a weapon prior to #TheFreshPrincessOfRenFaire but does just fine swinging a mace in the general direction of things she wants to hit. It's not like Supergirl has to worry about accidentally hitting herself or mastering its weight distribution. Barbara Gordon, a comparatively more skilled fighter, had previously stumbled immediately after grabbing the same mace.
Weak-Willed: Kara Danvers is effortlessly hypnotised to sleep by Paulette, a mere hair stylist, during #DyeHarder. Jessica Cruz also hypnotizes Kara in a manner Zee Zatara finds depressingly easy. Yet "will" is supposed to be Kara's strongest trait duing Mayhem In The Multiverse
Why Did It Have to Be Snakes?: "#LivingTheNightmare" implies Kara is afraid of bugs, specifically cockroaches. #SirenConch backs this up, with Kara leaping behind a chair in the Troubled Fetal Position after seeing one... but in her defense, those ones were pretty evil-looking.
Willfully Weak: Kara Danvers doesn't use all of her powers during her intial fight with Diana and, later, Jessica Cruz. Kara proves much more difficult to contain the second time while brainwashed by Ra's Al Ghuld to be uninhibitied, with Supergirl's flight in particular being problematic for Wonder Woman.
The Worf Effect: The entire team, sans Batgirl, suffers from it against Starro, but Supergirl takes the harshest beating of them all. Zee is merely face down, everyone else in or under wreckage. Supergirl is at the bottom of a crater the sunlight doesn't fully illuminate! Her remaining teammates all freakout when Supergirl bumrushes Katana and gets defeated by a single swipe.
Worf Had the Flu: Supergirl is the only one not intimidated but ready to avenge Diana when The Super Hero Girls discover something was in the process of assaulting their leader and actually managed to knock Diana flat on her face. Of course the resident Flying Brick would stand the best chance against Cheetah - which is why Supergirl's lured into Zatanna's magic blasts.

    Bumblebee (Karen Beecher)
A timid Gadgeteer Genius, Karen is one of the smartest, but shyest, girls in school. As Bumblebee, she uses a self-designed armored suit that allows her to fly and shrink.

Adaptation Dye-Job: In other incarnations Karen has brown eyes. Here, she has green eyes.
Adaptation Personality Change: She's less confident and shyer than other incarnations. She's has none of the mischievous tendencies the original comic book Bumblebee had as a teenager. In essence she's a Shrinking Violet in this version.
Adaptation Relationship Overhaul: Karen Beecher is no longer a member of The Teen Titans, but a babysitter of The Tween Titans.
Adaptational Badass: The upgraded suit of the show more obviously serves as armor that anything comic book Bumblebee wore, and has far more applications, like wireless communication, molecular scanning and physical projectiles. No sonic attacks though.
Adaptational Wimp: The Bumblebee suit doesn't seem to increase Bumblebee's reflexes and definitely doesn't increase her strength, or stamina. Bumblebee's second suit on this show is more armored than anything she wore in the comics up to that point, however and Diana Prince makes sure her team stays in physical shape, so Bumblebee doesn't really need the stamina boost here.
AM/FM Characterization: Karen regularly listens to boy bands, which showcases her Girly Girl and romantic personality.
Almighty Janitor: Karen is not above using the might of the Bumblebee suit to punish those who don't respect her authority as hall monitor.
Amusing Injuries: Bumblebee's casually swatted in her tiny form by Zee Zatara, who is horrified when Zee realizes what she just did. An Amazon also catches Bumblebee in her palm and proceeds to give Bumblebee a noogie.
Animal Motifs: Bumblebees are more docile than most stinging bees, but are still an animal most others would rather not be around when they show signs of agitation. Aside from her costume, she has a variety of bee-themed boxes and furniture in her house. Ironically, it wasn't her first choice of name, with Wonder Woman having come up with the moniker and Barbara encouraging her to use it.
Appropriated Appellation: She takes up the moniker of "Bumblebee" after Diana calls her that (as well as shoots down the name Karen wanted to go for), and Barbara tells her to roll with it.
Bumbleblee: I actually prefer "The Indestructible, Gamma-Phase, 1000k—"
Wonder Woman: Bumblebee.
Batgirl: Trust me, it's way better.
Apologises a Lot: Bumblebee is this way. In the pilot, she tries to angrily shut the door in Barbara's face but keeps on apologizing, leading Babs to just shut it herself.
Artistic License – Biology: Honey combs are made by honey bees. Justified in that the bumblebee motif wasn't what Karen Beecher was going for to begin with, but something Diana of Themyscira used in an attempt to instill more confidence in Karen. Something that Barbara Gordon proceeded to excessively push on Karen while helping Karen upgrade her suit.
The Baby of the Bunch: Karen is 14, whereas the rest of the group are all old enough to drive. She's also the smallest and meekest.
Batman Gambit: After Beast Boy steals her Transformation Trinket and Robin plans on disposing of it, Karen taunts Cyborg about it's locking mechanism being too complex for him to bypass. Cyborg puts off the unlocking to prove Karen wrong...and gives her access to the Bumblebee suit in the process.
Beta Outfit: Starts with a homemade suit that's duct-taped together, but still has the Hyperspace Arsenal and shrinking ability.
Beware the Quiet Ones: A shy 14-year-old who also happens to be an inventor with a robotic suit complimented by Diana. The one time she gets genuinely angry with her friends, they were so taken aback that they say they prefer the nice and shy Karen.
Black and Nerdy: The only black member of the gang, whilst also being passionate in science, inventory, and is overall The Smart Girl.
Brainy Brunette: Karen has brown hair and she's a Science Hero.
Butt-Monkey: Out of all the girls, Karen often suffers the short end of the stick; due to her being the smallest, she frequently gets overlooked, squished, or tossed around in fights. Doesn't help that she's also an Extreme Doormat.
Clothes Make the Superman: Her powers come from her armor.
Cute Clumsy Girl: Has a habit of stumbling and spilling her books/equipment all over the place.
David Versus Goliath: A running theme with Karen's situations is her meek and small nature being forced in handling larger problems, sometimes by herself.
Deadly Dodging: One of her tactics when engaging in battle in her smaller form. This becomes most effective against Giganta, where Karen's able to ironically mock "Why are you hitting yourself?"
Does Not Like Spam: She mentions in the Midterms tie-in graphic novel that she hates tuna. She also admits to Barbara in "#WorkingStiff" that she doesn't really like burritos.
Dork in a Sweater: She's a shy, unassuming character in a black-and-yellow striped sweater.
Duct Tape for Everything: Or electrical tape, in this case. She uses a lot of it to hold the parts of her prototype suit together, unintentionally making herself look something like a bee.
Embarrassing Nick Name: Hal Jordan calls her "Karen Danvers" after Karen "allows" Kara to give her a makeover.
Enemy Scan: Bumblebee's upgraded suit can analyze a target down to its molecular structure and crossrefernce its findings with databases Bumblebee herself isn't even curating. It can even zoom in to do so long range and take snapshots.
"Eureka!" Moment: As Karen's "teammates" are becoming discouraged at Diana's inability to adapt to their society and Barbara begins to argue with Kara, Karen suddenly gets the idea to blow off steam at an amusement park, which not only leads to Diana making progress at appearing like a teenager, but even starts to ease the tension between Diana and Kara, who until then had been the coldest towards Diana.
Extreme Doormat: Being the shyest member would get you this. The whole plot of "Enter Night Sting" is her being in disdain of being a pushover.
Expressive Hair: Her buns sag when she's sad or stressed.
Fangirl: Of the Twilight films parody, Just Before Dawn. All the girls watch them, but Karen's the most invested in the Love Triangle element.
Fear Is the Appropriate Response: The only one in detention alarmed to discover three/four of her classmates have super powers to the point she attempts to flee at their demonstration. Bumblebee also choosing to cut and run from the Super Villain Girls is Played for Laughs but it's later shown that while she could stop their Evil Plan by herself Bumblebee would have been crushed for it, had her friends not shown up in the nick of time.
Foreshadowing: #EnterNightSting sees Karen Beecher give The Reason You Suck speech to every single member of the team, including herself twice over. However, Karen stops and relaxes before she can really elaborate on what's wrong with Diana Prince, who Karen initially planned to save for last. As it turned out, Karen had a lot on Diana, having broken down what's wrong with her mathematically and charted it fifteen different ways. By the time of #TheMinus though the impending end of the world isn't stressing Karen out, so she's a lot kinder when she finally gets around to giving Diana her turn.
Future Me Scares Me: Understandable when future Karen's masked, hooded, quickly dispatched three of past Karen's friends who tried to fight, two more who were merely standing their ground and proceeded to march towards past Karen while past Karen's equipment was in disrepair.
Gadgeteer Genius: She's quite the tech expert. She designs and builds her own advanced gear, including her shrinking suit and various gadgets that help in battles.
Girly Girl with a Tomboy Streak: Karen adores romcoms, Just Before Dawn, boy bands, and is a huge romantic. However, she is also a skilled scientist who enjoys engineering and working with tech, even inventing her own gadgets and her suit.
Growling Gut: A main source of conflict in "#TacoTuesday": her stomach constantly growls through the short and makes things difficult for her, such as getting her kicked out of the library for being too noisy, or exposing her hiding spot to Doris when she tries to steal the taco Karen's been trying to eat.
Heart Is an Awesome Power: In "#SheMightBeGiant", she laments that her suit only shrinks her despite her efforts to make it do otherwise, but ends up discovering that shrinking is a great advantage against Giganta since she's too small, litterally fitting between the enlarged Giganta's fingers, and too quick for Giganta to get a hit on her.
I Can't Dance: Kara tries to teach Karen how to dance. This results in Karen bumping into people and being carried off but Kara thinks Karen did a pretty good job.
Locked into Strangeness: She gains her blonde skunk stripe after being electrocuted.
Misguided Missile: Her first suit made use of solid matter projectiles, but they proved to be unreliable. Her second armor suit swaps these out for "electrical sting" arm cannons, though her shoulder cannons still fire solid missiles if the stingers are not enough.
Mundane Solution: Bumblebee uses cornstarch to wick away moisture and reduce heat exhaustion in her armor.
Nice Girl: She's among the nicest members, let alone characters in the show, since she has the highest tolerance of team for the others' quirks and shortcomings.
Odd Couple: Diana constantly pairs her up with the sullen and silent Hawkman despite their wildly contrasting personalities and the fact that Karen is visibly intimidated by Carter.
Off the Chart: #TheMinus reveals Karen Beecher has a graph on what appears to be poster paper charting all of Diana Prince's activities. Karen then unfolds it in several directions until it starts overtaking most of the hideout's lobby and still has lines out of bounds. This convinces Diana she has a workaholic problem better than Antiope ever did. However, Diana takes it as a "to do" list that will make her more efficient.
Overshadowed by Awesome: Night Sting taunts Karen Beecher about being helpless without the Bumblebee suit, while #Beeline, #Retreat and #TheMinus highlight how she struggles to keep up on foot, but #SheMightBeGiant, #CrashCourse and #Powerless show that Karen is still an active, fit and physically capable teenager. Jessica, Zee and especially Barbara are just more so.
Power Glows: When she activates her suit and turns tiny, her body glows yellow.
Power of the Sun: Bumblebee's second suit is solar powered.
Proper Tights with a Skirt: Her outfit features a yellow skirt over a pair of brown-colored tights.
Pretender Diss: When Zee declares the most talented actor to ever grace Metropolis High will be playing Lady Katherine in #DramaQueen Karen gets confused because she thought Zee was playing Lady Katherine.
Rise of Zitboy: #Abracadabrapalooza is ostensibly all about Zee Zatara trying and failing to get Karen Beecher to realize pimples are not that bad.
Robot Master: Karen lives in a smart home where basic tasks are largely completed by autonomous machinery, both store-bought and of Karen's own design.
The Runt at the End: The only one in the detention causing food fight that did not willingly participate in any way whatsoever, the only one who tries to flee detention at the sight the others have super powers, the only one with no confidence in her abilities, the only one without a finished outfit, and is also the shortest.
Science Hero: Karen uses her extensive knowledge of science to build a suit that allows her to fly and shrink. While she doesn't have as many projects as Barbara Gordon, she proves to have the most scientific knowledge of anyone on the team. However, Karen also has the lowest athleticism and worst cardio, meaning she can't get as much done without her tech as Barbara can.
Shipper on Deck: She goes googly-eyed at the story of Carter and Shiera's Reincarnation Romance and desperately wants them to get together in this life, to the point that she overcomes her usual fear of Carter and basically forces him to pursue her. She is devastated when Carter decides in the end to avoid meeting with Shiera to break the cycle of their romance ending with both of them getting killed by Hath-Set.
Shoulder Cannon: One of her super suit's many accessories.
Shrinking Violet: She's a shy, insecure little girl. For bonus points, shrinking is her superpower.
The Smart Girl: She's a scientific genius who invented her suit and gear. She also wins a state robotics meet.
Still Sucks Thumb: Does this in her nightmare.
Stuffed into a Locker: Kara, distracted by her headphones, punches Bumblebee through the vents of a locker after mistaking her for a literal bumblebee, destroying Karen’s suit in the process. Barbara Gordon accuses her of squishing Karen and they're relieved to find a merely shaken Karen stuck in Kara's locker. Doris Zeul intentionally tries to shove Karen into a locker but Karen elects to do it herself to deny Doris the satisfaction (it doesn't work).
Teen Genius: She created her superhero suit and powers, and the yearbook lists her as "Most Likely to Graduate Early".
This Is Reality: Karen Beecher tries to disuade Zee Zatara's match making in #OneEnchantedEvening by telling Zee they are not in a movie.
Transformation Trinket: She uses a necklace with a honeycomb-shaped pendant to transform into her armor.
Unwitting Pawn: She's framed for starting a food fight by Barbara Gordon and thrown into detention for it so Barbara can examine Karen's equipment.
What Kind of Lame Power Is Heart, Anyway?: She initially believed that there's no benefit to being small. It wasn't until her fight with Giganta in "#SheMightBeGiant" that she starts seeing the benefits.

    Green Lantern (Jessica Cruz)
The newest recipient of a Green Lantern Ring, Jessica is a nature lover who aims to protect. Oh, and she's also a pacifist, so she always finds another way to battle as Green Lantern.

Adaptation Personality Change: She was neither a pacifist nor a Granola Girl in the source material. This likely has to do with the Stealth Pun of her being a Green Lantern.
Adaptational Angst Downgrade: Due to her darker roots in the comics (particularly becoming a shut-in for a while due to being traumatized from seeing her friends get killed by a pair of criminals they caught burying a dead body), Jessica here is made to have become much better adjusted by the time of the show, aside from begging Hal to take the ring back in the first episode. "#LivingTheNightmare" is the only time anything like the comics' Jessica's angsts are shown, and she does make a few references to her having the same issues as her comic counterpart in the past.
Adaptational Early Appearance: Relative to her Shea Fontana counterpart, she is among the main heroines from the beginning when her previous incarnation didn't show up until the fourth season.
All-Loving Hero: Because she’s a pacifist, she at least tries to turn them on the side of good. Plus, she is willing to be friends with anyone who doesn’t have any, Pam for example.
Animal Lover: The biggest animal lover on the team. She refuses to engage in the use of any animal products, volunteers at shelters to get pets adopted, and advocates for wild species, including those that are harmful to humanity.
Arbitrary Skepticism: #Retreat reveals that Jessica Cruz does not believe in zombies or witches. While it is plausible she never learned about Zee Zatara animating a presumably deceased octopus, she should know Zee is a witch in every way that's relevant to the topic at hand.
Badass Pacifist: Despite wielding the most powerful weapon in the universe, she refuses to use it for violence, and would rather talk her opponent down than throw a single punch. Dope Slapping Hal Jordan for being an idiot is fine, though.
Beauty Equals Goodness: She's very pretty, and in spite of her flaws, she's the third nicest person of the team.
Blow You Away: Green Lantern creates a green twister to bring The Tween Titans together...so she can put them to bed.
By the Power of Grayskull!: The Green Lantern oath seems to be mainly used like this in the show, instead of recited when recharging the rings. Except for the times when she zaps into uniform without saying it, but you're not supposed to be taking this show seriously, to begin with.
Comically Missing the Point: Karen Beecher is intimidated by the idea of baby sitting five kids at once and awestruck at the size of Wayne Manor. Jessica Cruz assumes Karen's reactions are to Jessica's five star review on "Metropolis Sits".
Cracking Up: #RageCat sees Jessica Cruz pop her neck after giving a not so Rousing Speech at an animal shelter.
Create Your Own Villain: Her attempts to give Dexter a home when he really just wanted to be left alone are what draws the Red Lantern ring to him in the first place.
Deadpan Snarker: As seen here when hanging out with Hal Jordan.
Jessica: Oh, Hal, must you be so wrong about so many things?
Deflector Shields: Jessica Cruz has a wide variety of them, from giant bucklers to brickwalls, to trampolines, to carrier crates.
The Determinator
Refuses to fight, even when Wonder Woman is yelling at her in the Training Montage.
In the short "#VeggieBurritoBucket", while filling in for a sick Babs' shift, she steadfastly refuses to serve meat to the customers, no matter how much they complain about her vegetarian substitutions, or how much Barbara's supervisor yells at her. When he tells her the meat is actually imitation meat (real meat being too expensive for them), she quickly and enthusiastically changes her tune.
Dope Slap: She punches Hal several times for his insensitivity in "#HateTriangle" after he breaks up with Carol via text message.
Dude, Not Funny!: Jessica almost calls it out by name as Kara laughs and makes several puns about the vandalism done to the school dance promotions and decorations during #MeetTheCheetah. #SoulSisters sees Jessica take issue with Kara inflicting Makeover Torment on the villains who had their souls taken.
Energy Bow: Creates one, with her ring, to stop Star Sapphire's heart barrage.
Facial Markings: When she powers up, the emblem of the Green Lantern Corps frames her right eye.
The Fettered: Lauren Faust has said she made her a pacifist because the Green Lantern Ring made her too powerful.
Flat-Earth Atheist: "#Retreat" reveals that she doesn't believe in witches or zombies, despite her teammate Zatanna being a sorceress and the undead brute Solomon Grundy later showing up as a villain.
Friendly Enemy: Jessica Cruz doesn't let friendship stop her from regularly protesting at the restaraunt Barbara Gordon works for in an attempt to get them to stop serving meat, or protesting all the shows the Zataras put on for using live animals.
Friend to All Living Things: She loves volunteering at the animal shelter and adopts a stray cat named Dexter, even after it briefly turns into a Red Lantern and fights her in the pet store.
Fun with Acronyms: Jessica Cruz runs an anger management program called "Getting To The H.E.A.R.T."(Healing Emotional Anger Requires Training)
Granola Girl: She's a big activist, especially concerning environmental matters. She was voted "Most Environmentally Conscious" in the yearbook. She is a Green Lantern, after all.
Green Thumb: The Green Lantern ring can heal plants, but it cannot bring them back to life.
HA HA HA—No / Rapid-Fire "No!": Her reaction to Star Sapphire assuming that she and Hal are together. Stretched out for a full ten seconds.
Happily Adopted: Jessica loves her two moms.
Hartman Hips: Her hips are noticeably wider than her bust or waistline, probably to emphasize her Team Mom status. It's more obvious when she's in her Green Lantern costume than as a civilian, though.
The Heart: She’s a pacifist who tries to resolve problems without resorting to violence. That includes between teammates, such as when Kara's attempts to bring Diana out of her crush get alittle too percussive for Jessica's liking.
Heroic BSoD: Has a big one in "#VeggieBurritoBucket" when working in a restaurant full of meat and required to touch and serve it. Learning that there's actually no meat whatsoever in the place, she immediately perks up.
Hidden Depths: Turns out she once had some severe agoraphobia and self-loathing anger issues in the past (like her comic book counterpart), as she admits to Supergirl at one point.
Honor Before Reason: She prefers to trust in the system when put on tribunal by the Guardians. In fairness, had she simply explained her actions concisely rather than producing a several hundred page report (which no-one reads), and had Hal not decided to "help", she'd have been fine.
Horrible Judge of Character: In "#RageCat", she is adamant that Dexter isn't a bad cat and just needs to be adopted by the right owner to redeem himself, completely ignoring all the signs that Dexter relishes causing harm and destruction. Even when Dexter becomes the Red Lantern Dex-Starr after obtaining a Red Lantern ring and tells Jessica to her face that he intends to harm her, this doesn't deter her from seeing the goodness in Dexter that just isn't there.
Irony: Hypnotizing Supergirl to be less violent doesn't actually solve her impulsiveness or two dimensional thinking. It makes them worse to the point Green Lantern has to become more aggressive to save her.
Knows the Ropes: Lassos are among the tools she generates when trying to subdue combative targets, much to Wonder Woman's approval.
Lighter and Softer: Played with. She had already undergone her Dark and Troubled Past and overcome with her struggles with it according to Word of God, so her story in the show will be about her moving forward with her life.
Long Hair Is Feminine: She’s one of the more feminine members with what being The Heart and Team Mom, and she also has long, wavy brown hair.
Mellow Fellow: While she is the most stubborn of the team, she is surprisingly easygoing and chill, heck, she’s even affectionate to others be they old friends or new ones.
My God, What Have I Done?: "#MisgivingTree" has Green Lantern trying to save human workers from Poison Ivy's rage when Green Lantern deflects a bulldozer Ivy throws at her and the workers. Instead of into somewhere safe, it hits an ancient tree that civilians Pam Isley and Jessica Cruz had chained themselves to. The tree is split open. When Lantern tells Ivy those workers could have been killed by Ivy, a grieving Ivy counters that Lantern HAD killed the tree. Lantern is aghast at realizing this, and Ivy believes with THAT killing act, "You are UNWORTHY of the color of Life, Green Lantern! And one of these days, you will pay."
Nice Girl: If Jess had any more compassion, she'd be an INDIGO Lantern. She definitely isn't without her flaws since she doesn't have Diana's consideration and is more confrontational than Karen, but either way, she is still the most compassionate and affectionate of the crew.
Nice Job Breaking It, Hero!: Jessica was making progress on Pamela Isley. Pam's potted plant Phil even liked Jessica and wanted Pam to give her a chance despite Pamela dubbing Jessica irredeemable for eating plants. But then Jessica brought Kara Danvers to one of her H.E.A.R.T. meetings and a totally unreceptive Kara taught Pamela to embrace her anger, even suggesting it would be okay so long as no one knew about it. Considering Pamela is secretly Poison Ivy, and is more prone to going full Poison Ivy when angry, Jessica unintentionally sabotaged her own till then working effort to reform one of the super villains trying to kill her, her team, and ultimatetly every last human being on Earth.
No Good Deed Goes Un Punished
She's thrown in detention for defending Karen Beecher from Kara Danvers, Zee Zatara and Barbara Gordon. Kara Danvers attacks her a second time for trying to breakup Kara's fight with Princess Diana.
Jessica's misguided attempts to raise Pam Isley's spritis lead to the raising of a zombie army.
Trying to be a responsible citizen and carpool leads to her mothers' van getting wrecked
Refusing to let Wonder Woman live in a tree leads to Jessica's house getting wrecked
She's assaulted by a cat with a deadly alien weapon for trying to prevent said cat from being put down.
Trying to help Kara Danvers with Kara's anger problems leads to Supergirl and Green Lantern being swallowed and nearly digested.
No Sense of Personal Space: Specifically with Pam Isley. Jess keeps embracing her at every opportunity and Pam is silently irritated each time. But as she never speaks up about it, Jess never gets the hint.
Not So Above It All:
She's rather smug about choosing a nonviolent solution in the Training Montage.
She's also every bit as willing to beat up Steve Trevor as the others.
Jessica Cruz is sympathetic to Barbara Gordon's issues with her dad, but that doesn't stop Jessica from laughing when he does something to embarrass Barbara.
Platonic Life-Partners: She and Hal Jordan work closely together as Lanterns, but there's else nothing between them.
Power Dyes Your Hair: Jessica has two neon green ones in her long brown hair. These appear when she's powered up and are otherwise a lighter shade of brown.
Power Glows: Her whole body glows a faint green when she powers up, including her eyes (normally brown).
Pulling the Rug Out: Her non-violent method of beating Kilowog in a sparring match.
Punched Across the Room: Green Lantern forms a helmet and suit of plate mail around herself when under assault by Amazons. She gets knocked out of it and off screen.
Pyrrhic Victory: "#MisgivingTree" has Green Lantern accidentally killing an ancient tree her civilian self tried to save. Why? To save the "innocent lives" of those humans wanting to cut it down in the first place.
Refusal of the Call: In her first appearance, she's seen trying to give the power ring back to Hal who refuses to take it. Naturally she's not keen to follow Barbara Gordon's call either.
Skewed Priorities: #TweenTitans sees Jessica Cruz apologize to Karen Beecher for what seems to be their impending death and or torture, laments that the Tweens are probably going to get themselves killed, and concludes that the worst part is that she will lose her five star rating on "Metropolis Sits".
Secret-Keeper: Being a Green Lantern, she knows Hal Jordan is one too.
Sigil Spam: In addition to the Green Lantern Corps symbol on her face and uniform, the hem of her dress displays a ring of them while she's in her civilian identity.
Soapbox Sadie: She’s prone to trying to fix others' problems whether they like it or not, which does tend to lead to more problems than solutions.
Stealth Pun: Along with being in the Green Lantern Corps, her Granola Girl tendencies make her very, very green.
Still Sucks Thumb: Relapses into this when she's having a nightmare.
Suspiciously Similar Substitute: For Poison Ivy from the original web series.
Sympathy for the Devil: In Star Sapphire’s first appearance, Jessica is clearly on her side once she learns Hal dumped her via text, although she does still feel obligated to prevent Carol from killing him. This disappears in their future interactions as Carol becomes convinced that Jessica is trying to steal Hal away, much to her disgust.
Take a Third Option: Being a pacifist, she tends to find a different solution to combat without physically fighting.
Jessica: I just believe that when it comes to fighting, there's always another way.
Rather than destroy the construction equipment about to "kill" the mannequins she's supposed to protect during her training, she encases them in a safe and moves it well out of range. This backfires when the "monster" attacks her teammates instead.
In "#RageCat", she can't get any of her friends to adopt Dexter because he's a jerk, but doesn't want the animal shelter to put him down. Since neither of those options works for her, she decides to adopt him herself (to his annoyance).
In "#TheGreenRoom", she uses her ring to translate an alien's screams as a warning about a bomb hidden in Metropolis. She stops Supergirl from attacking in order to buy enough time for the alien to find and remove it.
Team Mom: She's incredibly nurturing towards her friends and tries to help them in the best way she can. In "#TheSlowAndTheFurious", she reprimands Zee, Kara, and Diana for fighting over a radio station in her van like a mother would with her rowdy kids.
Technical Pacifist
She doesn't like fighting, and when she does have to deal with enemies she focuses on either defending herself and her teammates or on disarming the enemy or other non-violent methods. That said, she's not above hitting Hal Jordan when she thinks he's being difficult.
She also justifies violence against Plant Mooks by her being vegan. She's also forced to blast a hole in a protozoa to save an overeager Supergirl.
Transformation Trinket: Alongside all the other things her Green Lantern ring can do, it also lets her transform into her superhero outfit. Jessica has two transformation sequences. One for The Super Hero Girls and another for The Green Lantern Corps that she shares with Hal Jordan.
Unkempt Beauty: During #CrashCourse every member of the Super Hero Girls except Diana is shown to be sleeping in some degree of dishevlement. Jessica Cruz wakes up looking pretty well with even before she starts making up however...(Prince needs none).
Virtuous Vegetarianism: Jessica Cruz only eats plant and fungal matter, while encouraging other people to follow her example and help minimize their impact on the biosphere.
What the Hell, Hero?:
Gives this to Hal in "#HateTriangle" when Carol admits she was Dumped via Text Message by Hal.
And gets it from Poison Ivy in "#MisgivingTree" when she accidentally kills a 300-year-old tree that their civilian selves have been fighting to save.

    Zatanna (Zee Zatara)
A stage magician by trade, Zee aspires to be an "artiste" and follow in her father's footsteps. As Zatanna, she can do real magic... and she loves to show it off too.

Adaptation Dye-Job: Zatanna's black hair is now dark purple. It becomes a sparkling, glowing purple that transitions from a slightly lighter shade to a much lighter one when using her powers.
Adaptation Name Change: In most continuities, Zatanna's codename is her real name, Zatanna Zatara. Here, Zatanna is her codename and her real name is Zee Zatara, "Zee" usually a notable nickname.
Adaptation Personality Change: She's more of an egotistical showboat similar to Trixie or Rarity than how she is in most incarnations.
Adaptational Curves: Doesn't have her comic counterpart's Heroic Build.
Adaptational Modesty: No fishnets this time around. Sorry, Paul Dini.
Alliterative Name: Zee Zatara. Oliver takes the time to mock it in "#ScrambledEggs" while the two were paired for an Egg Sitting assignment.
Ambiguously Bi: Zee, like Diana, fell madly in love with a boy; in this case, Aquaman. However, in "#MultipliciZee" two of her clones were drinking ice cream from the same glass while staring at each other as if they were girlfriends while Barry looked at them somewhat puzzled. Also in "#SweetJustice", when she met Wonder Woman for the first time, she was struck by her beauty. Even in the movie Teen Titans Go! & DC Super Hero Girls: Mayhem in the Multiverse she felt awkward when Starfire from Teen Titans Go! fixedly stared at the Super Hero Girls with much glee.
AM/FM Characterization: Zee has a preference for jazz music, which suits her sophisticated and theatrical sensibilities.
Animal Motifs: She has a rabbit theme going on, in reference to the classic Pull a Rabbit out of My Hat trick. She owns two magical rabbits, her phone case has a rabbit on it, and when she first developed her powers, rabbits would randomly appear.
Asleep in Class: How Zee ends up in #AbraKachoo as her illness drains away her stamina. During a lesson on viruses no less.
Awesome, but Impractical: Her most impressive display of power in the premiere is used to flip the off switch on a trash compactor (and still took too long to actually save the practice mannequins). Wonder Woman explicitly calls her out on it, saying that her powers are impressive, but that she uses them in a way that lacks purpose.
Badass Cape: She incorporates a cape into her costume after Barbara recommends it.
Berserk Button: Adding to the Green-Eyed Monster entry below, she does not take well to people not paying attention to her magic.
A Birthday, Not a Break: In "#HappyBirthdayZee", it’s revealed that on her fifth birthday, her mother abandoned her and her father.
Birthday Episode: "#HappyBirthdayZee" centers around her birthday. It isn't stated how old she's turned, and the number of candles on her cake is nine in spite of her being a teenager, meaning there's too few candles to reliably indicate her age.
Bizarre Taste in Food: She prefers lots of pepper on her snacks (popcorn, nachos, etc.), to the point that no one else can eat them without suffering from profusely watery eyes.
Black and Blue and Scary All Over: Zatanna's dark magic powers contrast with her normal self's purple scheme as magic that takes a shadowy form with her eyes turned icy blue, especially during emotional distress. In fact, her nightmare self in "#LivingTheNightmare" is a Zatanna corrupted by dark magic that strips the purple parts of herself with pale blue.
Bound and Gagged: Zatanna's support is crucial to surviving Ember's assault, so naturally Zee is taken prisoner, silenced and immobilized before the fight even starts.
Bunnies for Cuteness: She has two bunnies that she uses for her magic shows (warning: Explosive Breeders who like each other a lot). Her phone case also has a bunny on it.
Call-Back: The Spam Attack that backfires in #MeetTheCheetah towards the start of the first season works as intended against Killer Moth in "#BreakingNews" towards the end of the season.
Captain Ersatz: A downplayed example. Purple hair, magic powers, ego, fashion, and prissiness in a show made by Lauren Faust? Characters like that are a Rarity, to be sure. But you'd be forgiven for making the connection.
Character Tics: Zee happily, habitually, obssessively files her nails to the point a stinging insect flying around her head can't make Zee look away from her hands. Even when Zee is scared and alert she's still prone to filing her nails as she looks around for possible danger.
Color Motif: Her design incorporates various shades of purple into it, and her magic aura also appears purple.
Combat Stilettos: She's the only one in the group who always wears high heels. Lampshaded when Barbara tries to wear them, but falls over with a crashing sound.
Complaining About Rescues They Don't Like: Zee is repulsed when Green Arrow saves her from being impaled by Cavalier in #DramaQueen.
Composite Character: The smug attitude of this Zatanna may be borrowed from mainstream Zatanna's younger cousin, Zachary Zatara.
Costume Evolution: She initially wears the classic Zatanna look (which is also her stage outfit), but Wonder Woman tells her to change it. Her current costume is inspired by her Bronze Age Justice League of America appearance.
Daddy's Girl: Became very close to her father after her mother left the family on her fifth birthday.
Deadpan Snarker: She's quite snarky and sassy when she wants to be.
Deflector Shields: One of her more common spells is surrounding herself with a sphere to ward off danger.
Dissonant Serenity: In the first episode, Zee winds up with her future teammates in detention, Zee files her nails and applies makeup while Diana and Kara engage in a wall-wrecking brawl.
Doppelgänger Spin: Zatanna can project her image to distant places using a "mirage" spell. In combat she can spam it to the point more than one mirage is visible at once and none are near where she really is. She can also produce duplicative illusions around an object to confound thieves.
Even the Girls Want Her: Casey Krinsky is CRAZY about her... until we find out the truth.
Everyone Has Standards: She has a large ego but takes her future passion very seriously. In particular, when it comes to the theater, she will not stand for goofing around and/or sabotaging the competition.
Evil Laugh: She bellows one out after flustering Oliver Queen about an upcoming show of hers happening at the same time as his own.
The Fashionista: The most fashion-focused girl in the group. Aside from having the most outfits out of any of the girls, she's also the one they go to for ideas, such as Diana in "#SweetJustice" and Kara in "#PowerSurge". In her profile video, Batgirl even describes her as "stylish", and the school yearbook lists her as "Most Likely to Become An Actress."
Faux Horrific: Zee was completely right to be worried about Casey Krinsky. Unfortunately when Zee tries to explain her anxiety to her other friends Zee only describes the ways Casey is helpful, so no one takes her seriously until it is too late.
Friendly Enemy: Zee Zatara is a friend of Jessica Cruz first and foremost, to the point she offers to help get Jessica a cab to a show of Zee's that Jessica intends to protest in front of for using animals.
"Freaky Friday" Flip: She casts a spell meant to smooth out a misunderstanding between Barbara Gordon and her father. What she actually does is perform a series of random mindswaps between Barbara and various residents of Metropolis. Luckily for Barbara her voice is retained so Zee can keep finding where she ends up.
Girls With Mustaches: When Karen Beecher grows a zit and asks Zee for help, she insists it is simply a part of puberty Karen has to deal with and Zee tells Karen about how Zee started growing a beard during puberty, among other unwanted but temporary changes.
Girly Bruiser: The most feminine member of the team, whilst also being just as much of a competent hero.
Graceful Ladies Like Purple: Purple is her Color Motif, and is definitely a Girly Girl.
Green-Eyed Monster: And how! Towards other performers stealing the spotlight from her.
Hair Flip: Has done this a couple of times in both civilian and hero form to showcase her status as a popular girl.
Hartman Hips: Just like Supergirl, her hips are noticeably wider than her waistline, not to mention she has thick thighs and a curvy rump.
Hidden Depths: In spite of her insistence that she has no insecurities, Zee has some deeply buried fears of abandonment and not being good enough that trace back to how her mother left and never came back. Zee also has fears of exactly what kind of damage she could be doing with her magic that have been suppressed by someone other than Zee herself.
How Do I Shot Web?: By the first episdoe Zee's already a powerful sorceress, but she still has a lot of work ahead of her.
I Believe I Can Fly: She can make herself and other things airbourne so casually Zee didn't even notice she could at first.
Impossible Hourglass Figure: She has very pronounced curves for someone who's technically just a teenager, which goes part and parcel with her status as a pretty popular girl.
Improvised Armor: Zee buries herself in pans and pillows when she sees Jessica Cruz testing her hypnosis of Kara Danvers by intentionally doing all she can to irritate Kara in #AngerManagement.
It's All About Me: Gets this attitude regarding her birthday every year, and expects the rest of the girls to play along.
Jerkass Has a Point: While she is more of a Ms. Vice Girl, even so she still makes some insightful points —
During the girls' first disastrous attempt as a team, Zatanna makes a sharp (but accurate) note that all Bumblebee did during the fight was hide.
Her anger at Kara for not following her strict rules for her magical rabbits is valid, given that Kara ignored her warning about keeping them apart and thus allowed them to multiply into a citywide swarm.
Taking away Oliver's part as the male lead in her play in "#DramaQueen" might have been a little harsh, but it wasn't exactly uncalled for—after all, Oliver did quite openly (and rather boastfully) admit to sabotaging someone else's chance at the role.
She points out to Jess in "#AngerManagement" that she shouldn't try to force herself onto Kara's anger issues, saying that her anger is something she has to choose to deal with herself. She also warns her that hypnotizing Kara to deal with said issues isn't a good idea, proven when her suggestion prevents Kara from taking the problem at hand seriously.
Large Ham: She has a rather large ego thanks to her background as a performer.
Long Hair Is Feminine: She has very long purple-indigo hair, and is the most feminine of the team.
Lovable Alpha Bitch: She's pretty, vain, and rather full of herself, but still a good person overall.
Magic Is Feminine: A magic-loving Girly Girl, both as a Stage Magician and as a hero-sorceress.
Magic Wand: Zee Zatara does not need a wand to cast genuine spells, but it is made clear that there are some spells she cannot pull off without it. At one point her attempt to transfigure a dead octopos into a hamburger for Kara Danvers went wrong because she accidentally used a pair of chopsticks sitting right next to her wand.
Magical Incantation: She casts spells by reciting the words backward.
Magicians Are Wizards: True to the origins of the character, she's a stage magician by trade but comes from a Human Subspecies with actual magical powers. In this version, she was her father's non-powered magical assistant first, discovering her powers (and becoming privy to his) as she grew up.
Mark of the Supernatural: She is from a Human Sub Species of magical beings. To go with this, she has abnormal purple eyes. They glow when she recites her longer incantations.
Missing Mom: Zee was raised exclusively by her father, and she doesn't mind at all. #HappyBirthdayZee reveals in a flashback that her mom left her and her dad on her fifth birthday.
Ms. Fanservice: Zee has a noticeable Impossible Hourglass Figure compared to her teammates (aside from Diana), and her civilian clothes include a very short skirt that covers less than half of her thighs and shows off her curves, making her look visually provocative. Even outside of that, she has a variety of other outfits that show off her shape, fitting her status as The Fashionista.
Ms. Vice Girl: As stated before, she has a large ego, can be very demanding, is often harshly critical and loves showing off, but she's still a Nice Girl.
Mundane Utility: She frequently uses her magic for things like housecleaning.
Neat Freak: She impulsively cleans up Kara's bedroom when dropping off her rabbits, and is determined to show up for school picture day with an immaculate appearance.
Phoneaholic Teenager: She likes to use her phone a lot, mainly for selfies.
Power Incontinence
When Zee's magic first manifested in flashbacks she hardly noticed at first and she couldn't make it do anything on command when she did, much less turn it on or off. Sometimes it would help her regardless or cause incidental changes to the world around her. Other times her own magic would actively attack her and her father. By the time of the first episode Zee's magic only happens when she wants it to and she has a few regularly used spells she can consistently pull off without issue. When Zee gets experimental however, things tend to go wrong.
Her basic power incontence comes back with a vengeance when Zee gets a head cold. Fortunately the older Zee is able to correct the problems it causes on her own, once she admits she is sick and it is causing problems.
Precocious Crush: She becomes smitten whenever Aquaman shows up.
Princess Phase: Zee often has fantasies of being a princess. She even calls Kara Danvers a "peasant" during #WasabiWar after giving up on making Kara appreciate when she got reservations to a sushi restaurant.
Properly Paranoid
She is correct in that no one should have the Book of Eternity, not even a "benevolent philanthropist" like Lex Luthor.
Zee's the only one on the team who finds Casey Krinsky's constant efforts to make their lives better in general and make Zee Zatara happy in particular creepy rather than endearing. While Zee bungled her attempts to talk Casey down and establish boundaries she was more right to try than she imagined.
Puberty Superpower: She started to develop magic powers without any warning during her childhood and couldn't control them at first. Her father was happy to find out about this, because he'd been worried that she might never have magic as he did.
Purple Is Powerful: Her signature color are multiple shades of purple, not to mention she’s a sorceress who’s probably the most powerful member of the team.
Queer Colors: Continuing with the previous point about her ambiguous bisexuality, the colors that Zee uses in most of her outfits are pink, blue, and purple, which are the three colors of the bisexual flag. They are even personified in her and her magical auras: light magic is represented by pink, dark magic by blue, while in both her civilian and heroic identities, the predominant color is purple. In fact, the conflict she goes through when confronting her dark magic and ending up accepting it as part of her can become an allegory for bisexuality, since like Zee, those who identify as such try to hide their sexual orientation until they accept this part of themselves.
Rags to Riches: During her earlier youth, she and her father were a traveling magic show that didn't make a lot of money and they lived in an RV. However, after one amazing performance, they got a worldwide tour, her father became an entertainer in a popular casino, and they moved into a penthouse suite in the attached hotel.
Really Moves Around: She and her father lived with their act on the road before they were successful enough to have somewhere in Metropolis to perform at regularly.
"The Reason You Suck" Speech: How she defeats Casey in "#AllAboutZee".
Casey: Smoke and mirrors, Princess of Prestidigitation? I expected better from you. Come out here and fight! I’m sick of seeing my pathetic little face! I mean your face! I mean… (screams in frustration)
Zee: What’s the matter, Casey? Don’t like what you see?
Casey: No! Nobody does!
Zee: You’re wrong! I liked you! At first. So did my friends! It was the evil plot to change who you are that mucked it all up.
Casey: Stop it! Quit it!
Zee: You could have had the friendship and acceptance you wanted, if you had only accepted yourself.
Rubber Man: Before Zee knew anything about controlling her magic she once involuntarily punched her father with an involuntarily stretched arm. Likely a reference to Giovanni's own comics where he foiled a murder attempt by catching a knife wielding man by stretching his arms.
Serious Business: Zee is usually a sweet if smug girl, but disrupt her performance and she can get mean really quickly. She curses another stage magician solely for getting more attention than her with simpler slight of hand tricks than her own, she warps gravity on a group of children for finding a Nintendo Switch more interesting than her birthday show, threatens to banish Garth to the 27th dimension for forcing her to fall back on Steve Trevor during her production of Romeo and Julliette and she makes Mortimer Drake, who she otherwise finds charming, into the understudy of her arch rival Oliver Queen because Mortimer recited the lyrics to "Up Past Eight" on her stage.
Sesquipedalian Loquaciousness: Zee coerces Karen Beecher into being her spokeswoman, and gives Karen cue cards with words Karen can't pronounce.
Shameless Self-Promoter: When she's cleaning Kara's room she turns one of Kara's Heavy Metal posters into one of the advertisements for her shows. In "#AdBlockers", she spends so much time putting up ads for one of her shows (and competing against Oliver for advertising his own show) that she forgets to actually put it on.
Shipper on Deck: In "#OneEnchantedEvening", she becomes fixated on having her father Giovanni Zatara and June Moon go steady.
Sitcom Arch-Nemesis: With Oliver Queen. Expect the two of them to trip the other up every time they're on screen together.
Small Name, Big Ego: She makes a huge deal about her "first solo production", which turns out to be a children's birthday party.
Smug Super: Oh so much, especially in "#SweetJustice". She puts a lot of pizzazz into simple spells and conjures up applauding hands when she accomplishes something.
Snipe Hunt: Zee sends Casey Krinsky off to reheel a pair of Camilla Gabrieli Stellas for Zee, so Zee can finally have some privacy.
Spoiled Sweet: As the daughter of a wealthy celebrity, Zee is accustomed to a lavish lifestyle. While she can be a snob when it comes to topics like fashion, cuisine, and the arts, she's still a nice girl who wants to do good as a superhero. Zee also likes to take her friends to high end places they normally would not be able to enjoy. Zee does tend to strong arm Karen Beecher into doing favors for her, but she also tries to mentor Karen through life's problems.
Squishy Wizard: Her spells can easily subdue some of the most powerful fighters the show has to offer, like Wonder Woman and Supergirl, but Zatanna can't take nearly as much from anyone else. She's also the second least athletic person on the team after Bumblebee, but that might be due to her insistence on wearing heels, as Supergirl and Barbara Gordon end up falling when walking in heels, Barbara in Zee's heels specifically.
Stage Magician: Zee Zatara is a talented stage magician whose tricks look like genuine magic. She can also do genuine magic, but her arsenal of spells she can reliably pull off is smaller than her convincing stage tricks.
Summon Magic: She can call for rabbits that will attack foes and obstacles in her path with Eye Beams.
Suspiciously Similar Substitute: For Harley Quinn from the original web series.
Thinking Up Portals: Zatanna can open up gateways to remote places with nothing but camera feed for reference...while looking at the wrong end of the camera. She can even send people to other dimensions with the right material.
Truer to the Text: In relation to her age when she first became a superhero, this version is a teenager when Bruce is already an adult as Batman, instead of around the same age as him as in the DC Animated Universe and onwards.
Unwitting Pawn: Zatanna's response to Cheetah racing around her in the dark is to launch as many projectiles as she can at any sign of movement. At this Cheetah leaves Zatanna alone. Not because Cheetah couldn't take Zatanna, but because she can goad the impulsive Supergirl into chasing her right to Zantanna's location, leading to Friendly Fire.
Unwitting Instigator of Doom: #OneEnchantedEvening involves Zee Zatara trying to raise her father's spirits by setting him up on a date with her art teacher, June Moone, unaware of the fact that June is possessed by the malicious Enchantress and that her actions are giving Enchantress an explicit advantage over Giovanni.
Vain Sorceress: Downplayed: Zee Zatara uses mundane makeup and gets her hair styled at a pricey but conventional salon. In the event something ruins her cosmetics, however, she isn't above using magic to put things back in order.
Vanity Is Feminine: Not only is Zatanna the most feminine member of her team (appearance-conscious, long haired, magical), she also tends to be the most self-involved and boastful.
Waistcoat of Style: She wears one as part of her civilian outfit, accented by a ribbon tie.

    Batgirl (Barbara Gordon)
Daughter of Gotham's Commissioner Gordon and Batman's biggest fan, Barbara moved to Metropolis in the middle of the school year. As Batgirl, she uses an extensive collection of gadgetry, inspired by the Caped Crusader.

Actor Allusion
There are way too many similarities between Batgirl and Twilight Sparkle, other than their voice actor.
More so considering Tara was considered for the role of Pinkie Pie as well.
Adaptation Dye-Job:
Batgirl's costume has changed from its contemporary dark blue design to classic purple.
Her eyes are green instead of their more common blue.
Adaptation Personality Change: Usually a more sensible and serious type, Barbara in this incarnation is a goofy Genki Girl.
Affectionate Nickname: "Babsy-Wabsy" and "Babbly-Boo" (used by Harleen Quinzel).
Animal-Eared Headband: She wears a bat-eared hoodie in her civilian identity.
Attention Deficit... Ooh, Shiny!: With her boundless energy comes a tendency to get easily distracted.
Badass Normal: She’s a normal human with no superpowers, but she makes up for it with gear and skill.
Bat Deduction: Wouldn't be a bat if she didn't have one of these. Namely, managing to work out Cheetah's entire motivation and backstory from a five second glimpse of her handiwork. And this before she even saw her.
Batman Gambit: When she suspects that the other girls are supers, she starts a food fight to get them all detention and have the chance to talk with them.
Big Brother Is Watching You: When they're trying to track down Diana, she casually informs the other Super Hero Girls that she's hacked their phones for that purpose.
Birds of a Feather: Ignoring which parts of the moral spectrum they fall on, it's no surprise this particularly hyperactive and zany version of Barbara Gordon is best friends with Harleen Quinzel right off the bat but has to work on getting in the good graces of Karen Beecher, Jessica Cruz, Kara Danvers and Zee Zatara. Given Batgirl's open desire to prove herself to Batman, it's also not surprising she makes quick friends with Wonder Woman, who secretly wants to prove herself to Hippolyta.
Brief Accent Imitation: #TheMinus involves Barbara Gordon imitating Diana Prince's, describing it as adorable.
Buffy Speak: Barbara Gordon is a tech genius but Karen Beecher is on such another level Barbara is reduced to describing components of Karen's equipment as "thingies" even after they're explained to her while giving Karen assistance.
Burger Fool: Has a part-time job at the Burrito Bucket, a local fast food joint. Unlike most cases, Babs loves the job and the only real drawback is a Mean Boss who constantly gets fed up with her laziness and slacking off.
Call to Adventure: Barbara plays a crucial step in Jessica Cruz, Karen Beecher and Zee Zatara becoming Green Lantern, Bumblebee and Zatana. Kara Danvers was already Supergirl and doing a pretty poor job of hiding it...if not for the fact no one knew "Supergirl" was even a thing, while "The Wonder Woman" was already Shrouded in Myth.
Clark Kenting: The fact she's always wearing a hoodie with pointy bat ears and the same color as Batgirl's cowl never sets off any alarms somehow. This example contains a YMMV entry. It should be moved to the YMMV tab.Then again, she is a massive Batman Fangirl.
Class Clown: According to the yearbook.
Cloudcuckoolander: Karen Beecher, a fellow scientific genius, Jessica Cruz, who has seen alien worlds, Kara Danvers, who is from an alien world, and Zee Zatara, who can literally do magic, all think she is weird and off her rocker. Based on how often she's right, she might understand their world better than them, but Babs nonetheless has an over active imagination and a deep well of enthusiasm for things they find strange.
Cool Bike: She owns an impressive Bat-themed moped with inflatable wheels, rocket boosters, and a parachute.
Complexity Addiction: "#FaultyPowers" has her using up all three of her "rejected" gadgets to save one person. And the foam grenade on its own would have been perfect for it.
Composite Character: She's Barbara Gordon in name, appearance and family, with a more Stephanie Brown-type personality.
Conditioned to Accept Horror: Gotham City is a garbage-strewn, murderous Wretched Hive, but for Barbara, it's home. When she and Harley are granted the rare chance to return, they celebrate by striking poses in chalk outlines.
Creepy Good: She hacks her way into teammates' electronics, she bugs her team-mates' phones, she has a survelliance network in the hideout, she reminisces happily about Gotham, and is cheerfully off-hand about knowing how to dispose of bodies. All in the same energetic and enthusiastic manner that she uses for everything else. This occasionally disturbs her team-mates.
Kara: Babs, for once can you not be creepy?
Deus Exit Machina: #AllyCat sticks Barbara Gordon on a visit to her grandparents so she can't direct the team's heist of Lex Corp.
Embarrassing Nickname: Babs's dad called her "Pumpkin Pants," seemingly after the "Princess Pumpkin Pants" show.
Everyone Has Standards: She's not very fond of Robin, but was horrified when she thought Harley Quinn flattened him to death.
Expressive Ears: The bat ears on both her cowl and her civilian hoodie move up and down based on her emotional state.
Expy: While it is not really confirmed, Tara Strong gives her a similar personality to how she portrayed Unikitty!
Fangirl: She's described as a video game and comic book fangirl. She's also a massive fangirl of Batman.
Fiery Redhead: Barbara is an excitable, fun-loving redhead.
Fun Personified: Barbara likes having fun. In #EnterNightSting while Karen Beecher's suit is offline and she's giving everyone "The Reason You Suck" Speech, Barbara gleefully asked to be verbally run down next.
Gadgeteer Genius: Bits of home-built high-tech gear and sketches for other projects are scattered all over a secret lab, and she's built a hidden computer system into the vanity counter in her bedroom. Ventures into Bungling Inventor at times, but even her rejected gadgets come in handy as seen in "#FaultyPowers". It's quite impressive considering that she makes all of it on her own without Batman's resources or training.
Genki Girl: She's spunky, upbeat, hyperactive, and energetic.
Green-Eyed Monster: Suffers from a trace of this concerning Batman's sidekick Robin, and thinks she's much more suited for the job.
Hero-Worshipper: Loves heroes, especially if it's Batman.
Horrible Judge of Character: In spite of multiple red flags, she never realizes what kind of person her longtime BFF Harleen is. Averted when it comes to Slade Wilson / Deathstroke, as Babs was able to realize there's something very off about him pretty quickly.
Hyper-Awareness: Like her hero, she's very good at picking up on the small details. It's how she gets her friends together in the first place.
I Thought Everyone Could Do That: Barbara Gordon chews out Jessica Cruz for not putting any gadgets in her mothers' van during #TheSlowAndTheFurious, Barbara stressing that even five year olds can put grappling hooks in bicycles.
Iconic Item: Her bat-eared hoodie.
In the Hood: Always wears her purple bat-eared hoodie in her civilian identity.
Instant Costume Change: She can don her Batgirl outfit in a split-second. Her bedroom has a pair of bunk beds; she sleeps up top and uses the bottom one as a changing booth, with a curtain to block it from view.
Ironic Fear: She's terrified of real bats, and completely freaks out when one gets into her room.
In-Series Nickname: A lot of her friends tend to call her Babs.
Jumped at the Call: Upon meeting actual superheroes, she wastes no time in rallying them into a team.
The Lancer: The Leader Diana is Barbara's exact opposite; for example, where Diana is rule-bound, Barbara is avant-garde. In addition, Barbara is the one who forms the team, often motivates them into action, and built their hideout. Diana is the leader because Barbara thrust her into the position.
Likes Clark Kent, Hates Superman: Not the biggest Robin fan, but adores Dick Grayson for being such a kind, considerate child. Conversely, despite her admiration for Batman, she thinks Bruce Wayne is an obnoxious egomaniac.
List of Transgressions: When Kara Danvers claims to want to change and puts Karen Beecher on the spot to tell her which flaw of hers needs correcting to prove it, Barbara Gordon produces a Long List of every problem she has with Kara, adding that she has one for all of her teammates.
Malicious Misnaming: In "#DCSuperHeroBoys", she taunts Ursa by deliberately misnaming her as "Ursula".
Motor Mouth: Veers into this when she gets overexcited.
New Transfer Student: She moves from the dank, grim city of Gotham to the bright and colorful city of Metropolis, where she meets the rest of the girls upon enrolling in the local high school.
Nightmare Fetishist: Barbara has a comically exaggerated fondness for growing up in a Wretched Hive like Gotham, and finds the seedier corners of Metropolis downright cozy.
Barbara: Oh, so we need to hide a body? No problem—I grew up in Gotham.
Nice Girl: Maybe not the nicest member of the team, but she's a decent person overall.
"Not So Different" Remark: Batgirl is skeptical about Supergirl and Bizarrogirl really being opposite or not, with her conclusion ending at "not".
Phoneaholic Teenager: Discussed: Barbara tells Diana that appearing absorbed with one's phone is a good way of diverting suspision. Barbara is very dependent on her phone, however.
Platonic Life-Partners: Is great friends with Barry Allen.
Secret Identity: Her father (Commissioner Jim Gordon) doesn't know that she's Batgirl.
"Shaggy Dog" Story: #StressTest ends with Barbara Gordon getting and F- on her test and Batgirl then immediately getting curbstomped during an attack on Metropolis.
Skewed Priorities: One would think an individual as intelligent as Barbara Gordon would have little trouble getting straight As in high school. #TheMinus reveals Barbara Gordon is deliberately trying to get her report card to spell "BABS".
Significant Green-Eyed Redhead: She's one of the main characters and has this color palette.
Super-Speed: Briefly after taking a bite of a special fruit of Themyscira in #TheMinus, which allows Barbara Gordon to move fast enough to surprise Barry Allen. This combined with Barbara being even more loopy than usual convinces Karen Beecher, who had been debating the fruit's merits with Kara Danvers, that the things needed to be disposed of. That one bite is even able to let Batgirl outrun Wonder Woman, who had been devouring the fruits all week!
The Team Wannabe: She desperately wants to be Batman's sidekick, but he doesn't seem to know she exists, and her odds have gotten even worse since she moved away from Gotham. She actually gets the job for a while, but gives it back to Robin after seeing how despondent he is without it.
Tomboy with a Girly Streak: Babs is one of the more tomboyish members of the team, with her most well-known trait is being utterly obsessed with anything Batman, is a Gadgeteer Genius and is unphased by the horrors of the world due to growing up in Gotham, but she's also a cheery Genki Girl, knows how to sew, making her Bat-Mite plushie and presumably her costume by herself, and when she was a little girl, she had a bike that, while obviously Batman-themed, was an otherwise typical girl's bike that was pink with white wheels, a basket and streamers.
Tomboyish Ponytail: Her everyday hairstyle is a ponytail.
Trademark Favorite Food: Burritos. She works in a burrito-centric restaurant and snuck in a bucket of them when going to the movies with her friends.
Trash of the Titans: Diana Prince and Jessica Cruz confront Barbara Gordon over the fact she's cluttering their hideout to the point it is becoming unlivable. While Barbara defends her many gadgets she has nothing to say for herself when they point out rotting food. Still, rather than get rid of it the only things Barbara actually cleans up are Diana and Jessica via a vacuum trap.
Verbal Tic: Often reacts to scares and surprises with a tiny "Eep!"
Vibrant Orange: Batgirl has orange hair and is spunky, upbeat and talks very fast when overexcited.
Why Did It Have to Be Snakes?: Barbara has a fear of sharks to the point she refuses to remove "shark repellent" from an underground hideout. She later has a nightmare about flying sharks, and a delve into it by Zatanna suggests Barbara is afraid of large marine life in general.
Zettai Ryouiki: Babs' civilian outfit involves shorts and thigh-high striped socks.
